
SHARN -- Authorities suspect magic sabotage in the collapse on Wir of Providence Tower in the Copper Arch district.

As of Zor morning, the death toll in the catastrophe stands at 19, with another 42 injured. Most of the bodies still lie within the rubble, and Watch Commander Kurna Dalgoria said recovery efforts would take several days.

"Divinations have confirmed that no victims remain trapped in the rubble, and House Jorasco is taking care of the remaining injured. Today our focus has shifted to investigation and the recovery of remains." Dalgoria said.

Dalgoria said the investigation, a combined effort among the Sharn Watch, the King's Citadel, and House Deneith's Sentinel Marshals, has turned up evidence that the tower's noonday collapse was no accident.

"Wherever these saboteurs are hiding, the Watch will find them. No matter how far they run, we'll be right behind them," she said.

Sentinel Marshal Rorick Thyrish arrived on the scene with the first emergency aid healers. He said he detected dim, lingering magic auras at the base of the tower.

"The evocation aura I detected was probably the spell that damaged the tower foundation," Thryrish said. "And the conjuration aura would be consistent with a teleport spell the culprit used to escape the collapse."

Thyrish said a third aura was present: a necromantic residue fainter than the other two. He referred further questions about the investigation to Dalgoria's office.

Dalgoria refused to speculate on the motives of the saboteurs. The tower has several expensive residences, an arcane research group's library, a small but well-appointed inn, and the offices of Warforged Rights Now!, an advocacy group for warforged created during the Last War. Dalgoria said any of the tower's inhabitants could have been the saboteur's target.

WROAT -- Former Sharn Watch commander Mathurin ir'Saldivar will be appointed by the crown to head the King's Dark Lanterns, the Sharn Inquisitive has learned.

King Boranel has scheduled a ceremony in Brokenblade Castle's West Gallery next Wir. After naming ir'Saldivar to lead the intelligence-gathering branch of the King's Citadel, the king will present ir'Saldivar with the ceremonial lanthorn of fearsome truths.

Members of the ir'Saldivar family and ministers in the Breland Parliament, speaking on condition of anonymity, confirmed that Mathurin will accept the appointment. Crown representatives declined to comment on King Boranel's schedule or any upcoming appointments.

Brelish Parliament Lord Ruken ir'Clarn said he had "grave concerns" about ir'Saldivar leading the Dark Lanterns. Since the end of the Last War, the Parliament has sought an oversight role in crown appointments -- a role King Boranel resists.

"There's a lot about ir'Saldivar we just don't know. Rumors of a connection between ir'Saldivar and the Boromar syndicate in Sharn, for example," ir'Clarn said.

Some of ir'Saldivar's connections to the Boromar clan are more than rumors. As head of the Sharn Watch, ir'Saldivar put a record number of Boromar clan members behind bars. However, critics accused his office of relying too heavily on undercover agents that committed crimes to maintain their cover identities.

Ir'Clarn said that the issue of parliamentary oversight goes beyond this appointment.

"I don't think the crown sees the potential benefit that parliamentary approval would bring," he said. "Once appointees for high office get approval from Parliament, they will know that all of Breland stands behind them. It's more than the confidence of the king -- it's the confidence of the whole nation."

When named to the post, ir'Saldivar will replace Daal Chorek, who resigned the post in Aryth in the wake of the Tattered Flag scandal. Members of Parliament accused Chorek of harboring war criminals from the Last War, granting them new identities as manor lords in rural Breland. Chorek was acquitted in a subsequent crown trial.

SHARN -- A Morgrave University team led by Antiquities Professor Casimir ir'Tannan announced on Wir that they've decoded the Code of Vvaraak, a puzzle that has fascinated cryptographers, linguists, and historians for decades.

The Code, created more than five thousand years ago by a dragon named Vvaraak, is found on inscriptions in ruins across Khorvaire.

"The characters and symbols in the code correspond to no known ancient language," ir'Tannan said. "But we thought we recognized some patterns in the syntax -- the order in which the symbols were strung together."

The key to cracking the code, ir'Tannan said, was accumulating Khorvaire's largest collection of Vvaraak antiquities. Morgrave University used its own researchers, expeditions from the Wayfarer Foundation, and independent explorers to copy or acquire examples of Vvaraak's inscriptions.

"If you're going to decrypt something, it's important to get the largest sample you can," ir'Tannan said.

Vvaraak's inscriptions can be found on ruins across Khorvaire, ir'Tannan said. The Lost City of Harad-Nui off the Qbarran coast, the ruined Mines of Blazegold in the Mror Holds, and the Seals of Aal'drash in the Shadow Marches have extensive examples of the Code of Vvaraak.

One remaining puzzle: Why the Code of Vvaraak resisted divination magic.

"We employed all sorts of divinations, but even efforts to commune or contact other plane didn't get us anywhere," ir'Tannan said. "In the end, it came down to a lot of brute-force cryptography and the extraordinary ingenuity of my team."

The team's findings, along with a complete lexicon for the Code of Vvaraak, will be published over the next several months, ir'Tannan said.

"Just as we're standing on the shoulders of great historians who came before us, I hope that our discoveries inspire the next generation of students," ir'Tannan said.

But reaction from the academic community was mixed. Athuran Happlestep, history professor emeritus at the University of Korranberg, called the effort to decrypt the Code of Vvaraak "typical Morgave irresponsibility."

"We know so little of Vvaraak, but we do know this: It trapped or killed a lot of strange monsters from far-off dimensions," he said. "Now that anyone can read Vvaraak's inscriptions, what's to keep tomb robbers from opening a bunch of mystic seals and unleashing horrors that the world hasn't seen for thousands of years?"



SHARN -- House Lyrandar agents questioned several residents of the Mithral Tower district on Mol after mysterious lights approached airships departing from Lyrandar Tower.

A cluster of the translucent, glowing lights approached the Virtue's Price from Mithral Tower and floated around the hull before streaking back to the towers of Sharn.

Mol's encounter marks the third time this week that an airship crew has reported seeing the strange lights. Most eyewitnesses say the lights are spherical or ovoid, but some say they take a bipedal form when they cluster together.

"I didn't really see features, but it looked a bit like a glowing woman with arms outstretched," said Tinar Blugostra, a passenger that disembarked from the Virtue's Price just before it departed Sharn.

Blugostra said she watched the glowing lights flit across the deck and hull of the rising Virtue's Price. It floated near the observation dome on the lowest deck of the airship, she said -- "almost like it was peering through the windows at the passengers."

House Lyrandar spokesman Korvik d'Lyrandar emphasized that passengers and cargo were unharmed by the light display. Most found it amusing, he said.

"What we're seeing is probably a natural magical phenomenon or the activity of a few arcane pranksters," he said. "Airship travel remains the safest, most luxurious way to travel across Khorvaire. All that happened is that our passengers got a free light show as they departed Sharn."

The House is reviewing its security procedures and will augment the magical and mundane protections around its ships, d'Lyrandar said.

House Lyrandar representatives, accompanied by Sharn Watch inquisitives, questioned "about a dozen" residents of Mithral Tower about the lights, chief inquisitive Yari Talanak said. None were considered suspects and no arrests were made, he said.

Moira Harnatri, arcane studies professor of Morgrave University, noted that illusion magic could create the glowing lights but surmised that the mysterious lights weren't merely a manifestation of dancing lights or another common spell.

"If eyewitness accounts are to be believed, the lights were too bright, too big, and too fast to be a simple evocation," she said. "And the lights persisted after the airships were more than a thousand feet above the skyline -- beyond the range of a wizard on the ground."


	02/07/2005

	

Search for Missing Royal Aide Continues
News for Sul, Olarune 8th, 998
By David Noonan




SHARN -- On Sar, family members of royal aide Shauranna Rokesko expressed hope that she might still be found, despite two days of fruitless searching throughout the breadth and height of Sharn.

"Shauranna must know that we're out there looking for her. If we have to search every room in every tower, we'll find her and bring her home," said her father, Kal Rokesko.

This morning, City Watch commanders reported that they were doubling the number of searchers across the city and assigning the case to inquisitives in every precinct. Commander Banath Hururik said anyone with information about the Rokesko case should contact the nearest City Watch official immediately.

Rokesko, an aide to Royal Minister Yarik Freul, disappeared from her room at the Sovereign Towers Inn on Far evening. Watch captains told the Sharn Inquisitive that the room showed fire damage and signs of a struggle, although Watch commanders refuse to discuss the investigative details of the case.

Freul, a crown liaison to the Sovereign Host, came to Sharn with his staff for an annual meeting with Onatar priests. He returned to Wroat on Sar to petition that the crown assign the case to the King's Citadel.

"I have every confidence in Sharn's City Watch," Freul said in a scribed statement on Sar. "But because I and my staff deal with sensitive matters of state, it seems prudent to involve those with expertise in such matters. Shauranna is no ordinary girl, and this is no ordinary disappearance."

The reward for Shauranna's safe return now stands at more than 1,000 gold coins. House Kundarak officials responsible for administration of the fund said that concerned citizens are still donating, so the reward is likely to grow.


Livestock Deaths Puzzle Ranchers
News for Sul, Olarune 8th, 998
By David Noonan




FAIRHAVEN -- Baffled ranchers in western Aundair expressed their frustration on Zol after finding dozens more dead sheep and cattle in remote grasslands.

Predation on livestock is nothing new to the ranchers, but these cattle and sheep have apparently been strangled or crushed, then bled dry. Each corpse bears a series of circular wounds the size of dinner plates.

Vaun Manakuli, a shepherd on the Eldeen border, reported that he had lost five sheep to the mysterious menace. "I'd heard the rumors, so I'd been staying awake at night to protect my flock," he said. "It was almost morning when I heard this low, groaning sound coming from over the hill. I ran as fast as I could, but by the time I reached the top of the hillock, I'd lost five sheep."

Whatever killed his sheep did so in seconds, Manakuli claimed, because he was less than 100 feet away when he heard the groaning sound.

Renowned hunter and naturalist Carsenni Rhun described the wounds as perplexing. He vowed to be the first to bring in the beast responsible -- dead or alive. "I've hunted across Khorvaire, from the Shadow Marches to the jungles of Q'Barra. No one's ever bagged anything like this, so I guess I'll be first," he said.

Rhun speculated that an octopuslike tentacle could have caused the wounds. "When I was diving in Eldeen Bay shortly after the war, sometimes I'd see a whale with a circular scar. Such marks are from the incredibly powerful suckers on the tentacles of certain sea-beasts," he said. "But the scars on the whales weren't much bigger than my hand," he continued. "What behemoth could leave a tentacle mark as big as these?"

Gaps Exist in Graywall Defenses
News for Sul, Olarune 8th, 998
By David Noonan




WROAT -- On Zor, retired General Tauma Hilliard issued a report criticizing Breland's postwar western defenses. The report stated that "critical gaps in the Graywall fortifications endanger the entire realm."

Hilliard's report, delivered to the crown at King Boranel's request, said that bandits, marauders, and monsters from Droaam continue to slip through the Graywall Mountain passes and menace western Breland, even though the Graywall region is one of the most heavily fortified locations in Khorvaire.

Hilliard's report cited four breaches of the realm's defenses in Zarantyr alone. Furthermore, when the snow that renders many Graywall routes impassible melts, incursions from Droaam are likely to increase.

"While the Graywall fortresses themselves remain secure, the Breland military cannot project force across the entire border," the report continued. "For every monster or bandit gang the army defeats, another one slips between the patrols."

Among the incursions last month were the following incidents.

In a series of raids on the mountain villages of Skerritburg and Olinton, gnolls killed 39, wounded scores more, and caused extensive property damage.

A medusa attack on Watchpost 15 left fourteen petrified.

A band of trolls sacked the mining town of Harrack. The creatures used a previously undiscovered tunnel to enter the mines directly and elude Brelish patrols.

A minotaur/orc horde clashed with elements of the Brelish 11th Battalion at Jasper Pass. Some minotaurs and orcs managed to escape east into Breland before Brelish reinforcements arrived.
Hilliard's report recommended a 20 percent increase in troop levels across the Graywall border. It further advised that troops stationed there would require extensive magical support and training in long-range reconnaissance.

Shipwrecks May Mark Pirate Escalation
News for Sul, Olarune 8th, 998
By David Noonan




TROLANPORT -- The Lucky Larkspur washed ashore on the Zilargo coast last week. The bodies of its crew had been mutilated almost beyond recognition, and its cargo was missing. The Lucky Larkspur is the third ship to suffer such a fate in the last two months, and port officials speculate that a new band of pirates may be responsible.

"Pirates revel in the fear they cause, but this sort of ritualistic murder goes far beyond the pale. These pirates, whoever they may be, are by far the most bloodthirsty madmen I've ever come across," said Parlo Garrelspan, the Trolanport harbor administrator. Garrelspan asserted that most of the merchant ships plying the Sea of Storms are hiring extra marines to guard their vessels against the pirates. Thus far, the marauders have left no survivors, and no calling card other than the dismembered bodies of the crew.

"While this new band of pirates is bloodier than others, they represent only a new incident in a worrisome trend," said Garrelspan. "We've seen a real influx of pirates on the Sea of Storms recently. The conclusion of the Last War left too many war-trained sailors and not enough peacetime ships for them to crew. Unfortunately, a lot of them turned to piracy."

Thus far, all the stricken ships have been owned by smaller merchant companies, but House Lyrandar and the navies of both Breland and Zilargo are taking the matter quite seriously. A House Lyrandar captain, however, speculated that pirates might not be to blame. "The sahuagin dwelling in the Straits of Shargon have some appalling sacrificial rites," Captain Derenver d'Lyrandar said. "If a sahuagin tribe has migrated into a shipping lane, its members could easily produce this sort of damage."

"I know what the gnomes think," d'Lyrandar continued, "but pirates are too smart to just butcher everyone. They want their victims scared enough to surrender, not so certain of their impending doom that they're willing to fight to the death."


Mysterious Monoliths under Construction
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




SHARN -- On Zol, Morgrave University anthropologist Guthra Maranech displayed astonishing drawings depicting thousand-foot-tall ovoid structures under construction deep in the Sarlonan wilderness.

Maranech told a packed lecture hall that while he was uncertain as to the monoliths' purpose, the "psionic" energy that provides the Inspired with their mental powers seemed to fluctuate wildly in the area around these structures. "When we discuss purpose, we enter the realm of conjecture," Maranech said. "But based on the energy readings, I would have to speculate that these monoliths are some sort of psionic batteries or amplifiers."

Throughout his two-hour lecture, Maranech noted that his depictions of the monoliths, which he observed during a covert visit to the Riedran Empire, are nearly a year old. The anthropologist was detained by Inspired security shortly after entering the Valley of the Monoliths.

Maranech ended his lecture with yet another astonishing revelation. "Some of the details I observed suggest that the monoliths may have quasibiological motility," he stated. "Consequently, they might not even be in the valley anymore."

Maranech's return to Sharn marks the conclusion of nearly four months of negotiations between Brelish and Inspired ambassadors. The anthropologist said the Inspired had treated him well during his detention and even granted him access to Riedran texts for study.

Thahad Vulreath, Second Prefect for the Adar government-in-exile, called for the Riedran Empire to make public the purpose of the stone objects and allow neutral observers to monitor events in the Valley of the Monoliths. "Given the Riedrans' oppressive policies toward the Kalashtar minority remaining in Sarlona and elsewhere, we cannot help but wonder what new horror these monoliths represent," he said.

Diplomats at the Riedran Embassy in Sharn were unavailable for comment at press time.


	

Droaam Hordes Press Graywall Defenders
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




ARDEV -- A horde of minotaurs, ogres, gnolls and other monsters from Droaam clashed on Mol with Breland Army units guarding the Graywall passes. More than 2,000 Droaam warriors, with gnolls and ogres dominating the raiding parties, attacked at dusk in a series of incursions covering some two-thirds of the Graywall theater.

Early situation reports indicate that the hordes are directed by the Daughters of Sora Kell, who seized power in the region after Brelish forces withdrew in 987. The current assault represents the most significant push this year by that organization.

Junior officers retreating from advance posts in the Graywalls reported the capture of at least three mountain citadels: Mt. Anglio, Virtue Soars, and Blackwood Cleft. The disposition of those citadels and others in the Graywalls could not be confirmed with the Breland Army high command. These three fortifications were among the thirteen built in 990 after passage of the controversial Graywall Levy.

Retreating soldiers reported typical tactics on the part of the Droaam hordes, whose members gave no quarter and took few prisoners. Several retreating squads were turned to stone by medusas in the Daughters' pay, then smashed into rubble by the ogres and trolls in the advancing hordes.

Breland's 7th Army, still in winter quarters in Galethspyre, immediately began preparations for a forced march to bolster the Graywall defenders, Brelish Army officials said on Zol. Rumors that Borumel's War Council would redeploy the Argonth floating fortress to the Droaam border could not be confirmed at press time. Argonth last appeared in the Graywalls in 991 to stem a rising tide of gnoll incursions.

Critics of the crown's Droaam policy decried the Graywall defense plans even as they expressed support for the Brelish soldiers holding the remaining citadels against the monstrous assault. "When the king withdrew from western Breland eleven years ago, we all worried that a situation such as this one might be the consequence," said Baroness Avarulao, one of the Brelish citizens resettled in 987, now serving as Adjunct Minister for the Dispossessed of Western Breland. "What was once our beautiful homeland is now a breeding ground for endless waves of horrible monsters."

In a strongly worded speech before Parliament, Avarulao advocated the launching of a "cleansing crusade" to wipe out the Daughters of Sora Kell and reclaim western Breland. Provisions of the Unity Act of 988 prevent the Breland Ledger from reprinting her statement in detail.

About the Author

David Noonan is a designer/developer for Wizards of the Coast. Before coming to Wizards, he was a daily newspaper reporter in Washington state. Apparently the city hall beat is good practice for an Eberron campaign.

Prince Halix Enrolls at Rekkenmark Academy
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




REKKENMARK, KARRNATH -- Prince Halix ir'Wynarn, youngest of King Borumel's sons, enrolled on Wir at Karrnath's prestigious Rekkenmark Military Academy. Halix, who has resided in the Karrnath capital of Korth since 997, will take a historical course on the military campaigns of Karrn the Conqueror (-2049 to -1992). The reason for the prince's choice is clear -- Rekkenmark possesses one of only four surviving originals of Karrn's Analects of War, considered by most military commanders to be the seminal text on military strategy.

By virtue of his noble title, Halix also holds the rank of colonel in the Army of Breland. He is thus the highest-ranking Brelish officer to attend Rekkenmark since the start of the Last War.

The prince's course of study was announced on Sul by Syra ir'Tarrn, Karrnath's ambassador in Sharn. "We're delighted to have someone so capable at Rekkenmark," ir'Tarrn said. "But beyond that, Prince Halix's decision to study at the academy shows how far we've come since the Treaty of Thronehold. Just a few years ago, a Brelish prince studying war at a Karrnathi academy would have been unthinkable."
Breland military commanders, speaking on condition of anonymity, had mixed views on the prince's decision.

"Make no mistake, I'd lay down my life for the crown," said one high-ranking general. "But it's a shame that our prince can't learn Brelish tactics from Brelish veterans, rather than seeking some kind of Karrnathi pedigree. Those Rekkenmark blades killed a lot of fine Brelish soldiers."

Another army general, however, was more sanguine about the situation. "As long as he brings back some understanding of Karrnathi integrated polearm tactics, I'm in favor of his decision. That sort of knowledge might become quite useful someday, if you take my meaning," she said.


	

POW Protests Rock Sharn Towers
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




SHARN -- An estimated 1,000 protesters marched through Sharn's Bazaar and Hareth's Folly districts on Mol, blocking key intersections and clashing with city guards throughout the late afternoon and evening. City Watch troopers were dispatched from the Daggerwatch Garrison at 6 p.m. to deal with the disturbances. By 10 p.m., nearby precincts surveyed by the Breland Ledger reported more than 150 arrests.

Blood of the Disappeared, a group founded by the parents and spouses of missing Brelish soldiers, organized the rally to protest what they called "foot-dragging" on the part of Breland's War Ministry and diplomatic corps. "We've been at peace for two years now, everyone says. But for us, there is no peace," said Blood Councilor Maruena Tokaunt in a speech to a crowd at Markenny Plaza. "Our government, from the crown on down, needs to take responsibility for negotiating an exchange of soldier remains and any living prisoners. Furthermore, the national armies must open their records so we can find out what happened to the thousands of missing and captured troops."

Most of the arrests were for disturbing order or property destruction, according to Watch Captain Zell Garrithall. Property damage was limited to street signs, some storefronts, and several tavern interiors.

Assistant War Minister Arneth ir'Challis said that while the crown welcomes "open discussion about the fate of those who gave their all for Breland," negotiating such agreements is a time-consuming, difficult process. Older missing-in-action cases tend to be delayed because of a simple lack of information, ir'Challis explained. "After nearly a century of war and upheaval, detailed records on every military engagement just don't exist anymore," he affirmed. "Sadly, we'll never know exactly where and under what circumstances each hero of Breland fell."

Adding to the frustration of investigators is the fact that more recent cases are sometimes cloaked by the demands of military secrecy. "When we inquire about missing and captured soldiers from the last year or two of the war, we get stonewalled," ir'Challis said. "Other nations don't want to divulge the details of recent battles because doing so means giving away intelligence."

Ir'Challis also emphasized that to the War Ministry's knowledge, Breland is holding no living prisoners from the Last War. He called on other governments to make the same pledge.

Tokaunt echoed that call. "The war is over -- doesn't everyone realize that? What possible reason could a nation have for continued imprisonment of enemy soldiers?"


Korranberg Library Shares Records
News for Sul, Eyre 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Korranberg Library Shares Genealogical Records with Karrnathi Cult

KORRANBERG -- On Wir, Library of Korranberg loremasters announced their intention to share genealogical tomes with the Blood of Vol, a controversial cult native to Karrnath. Twelve Blood of Vol priests will have open-stack privileges at the Korranberg Library, and a dozen Korranberg researchers will gain similar privileges at the Blood of Vol's Crimson Monastery, which is located in the Karrnathi city of Atur.

Loremaster Hurian Zarrek emphasized that despite the Blood of Vol's macabre beliefs, the information in the cult's genealogical records rivals the combined lore of Korranberg itself. "So many family histories were destroyed or lost in the Last War," Zarrek said. "Our records of the noble families living in northern Khorvaire are spotty, but the Blood of Vol has records going back for centuries. This historic opportunity was simply too good to pass up."

Blood of Vol worship is legal in Karrnath but forbidden elsewhere -- including in Zilargo -- because of cult members' tendencies to dabble in necromancy and other unsavory practices. Zarrek stated that for this reason, the priests from Karrnath would be strictly enjoined from conducting public religious ceremonies or advocating their cult while in Korranberg.

Zarrek further affirmed that this agreement marks a significant coup for the Library of Korranberg. "Never before has the Blood of Vol offered up any of its lore for the scrutiny of others," he said. "This arrangement could easily result in a doubling of our genealogical information."

The priests from Karrnath are due to arrive in approximately one month. The Korranberg researchers should depart next week.


Mournland Incursion Devastates Village
News for Sul, Eyre 15th, 998
By David Noonan




VATHIROND -- A horde of ghouls attacked the village of Janwell and killed scores of villagers. Augmenting the marauders' strength were numerous magical conflagrations known as living spells.

The attack began at dusk and continued throughout the night. By morning, the village had fallen, and most of its people lay dead. At first light, however, the marauders slipped back into the Dead-Gray Mists on the border of the Mournland.

Among the slain were local lord Orina ir'Ghalaro and the staff of a chapel devoted to the Church of the Silver Flame. Most of the survivors were villagers who had taken shelter in a forest to the west at the first sign of trouble.

The marauders included a massive construct known as a cadaver collector. The name seems to be something of a misnomer, however, since the construct doesn't limit its harvest to corpses.

Rhennek ir'Tallon, the region's representative to Breland's Parliament, offered condolences to the families of the slain and promised that their deaths would be avenged. "I visited Janwell just last year for the apple harvest festival," ir'Tallon said, "and never have I seen a more pleasant hamlet. All our hearts go out to the families of those who lost their lives in this senseless attack."

But ir'Tallon did not stop with mere sympathy. He indicated that within the week he would bring a plan before Parliament to put more soldiers on Breland's border with the Mournland.

Periodic incursions from the Mournland are a fact of life in far eastern Breland, but survivors indicated that this attack was another matter entirely. "Once or twice a month, some nasty beast comes out of the mists -- a carcass crab or some other horrible creature," said guard captain Aorolo Roklins. "But this attack was far beyond the norm. The marauders were organized and completely ruthless. However, they didn't loot any valuables, and property damage was minor."


	

Red Gauntlet Regiment Reunites in Sharn
News for Sul, Eyre 15th, 998
By David Noonan




SHARN -- The surviving members of the Red Gauntlet Regiment have gathered in Sharn this week to commemorate the fifth anniversary of the Battle of Kennrun.

The regiment, composed of mercenaries who fought for Breland throughout the latter years of the Last War, was instrumental in Breland's victory at Kennrun. During that battle, elements of the Red Gauntlet Regiment prevented three heavy brigades from reinforcing the Cyran lines, enabling the Brelish 21st Cavalry to break through and liberate eastern Breland. The Red Gauntlet Regiment also served with distinction in the Graywall citadels during the late 980s, and during the "Great Thrust" battles of 992, when Breland pushed Cyran forces back to the original Breland/Cyre border.

Fewer than one hundred veterans of the regiment are alive today because its members were engaged with Cyran forces on the Day of Mourning. The regiment's standard is among those hanging at Athalus's Tomb in Wroat, dedicated to the Brelish victims of the Day of Mourning.

To commemorate the reunion, King Borumel issued a royal proclamation declaring the gauntleteers honorary members of the Army of Breland. This action is highly significant because the regiment's relationship with the regular army was often difficult.

House Deneith, a minority owner in the regiment's contracts throughout the Last War, also plans a ceremonial color guard ceremony in honor of the Red Gauntlet Regiment next Sul. On that day, Deneith soldiers across Breland will wear red gloves in honor of these brave veterans.

"The ceremonies and proclamations are appreciated," said Red Gauntlet Sergeant Darius Pike. "But the reunion is more about remembering the gauntleteers who never returned from Cyre in 994. I survived only because I was assigned recruiting duty in the winter of 993 -- an assignment I didn't particularly want.

"I used to know the thirty guys in my platoon better than their own families did," Pike said. "And my whole company was like family to me. Only three of those guys are still around. So we'll hoist a tankard for the other one hundred forty-odd brothers who are out there in the mist somewhere."

Gladiator Fight Legalization
News for Sul, Eyre 15th, 998
By David Noonan




DATELINE -- Sava Kharisa, Sharn City Council member for the Lower Central Ward, said the city should rescind laws forbidding gladiator matches within the city limits. "Today a shadowy network sponsoring pit-fights and other gladiator matches is forced to play hide-and-seek with the city guards," she said. "Certainly our guards have more useful things to do than arrest citizens seeking an evening's leisure. As long as the gladiator matches are safe and the participants are willing, we should give the people of Sharn what they clearly want," she insisted.

Gladiator matches are forbidden by a variety of anti-gambling, anti-dueling, and anti-bloodsport statutes. Therefore, participants must change the locations of their matches frequently to avoid the City Watch. Rescinding the statutes, however, would take the agreement of the full City Council, and such consent may not be forthcoming.

Savia Potellas, who represents the Firelight district where the famous Burning Ring matches usually take place, accused Kharisa of meddling in the affairs of other wards. "It's a known fact that the Daask gang runs the Burning Ring and a lot of other pit-fighting spectacles. Lower Menthis has enough problems without the crime that these monster-created bloodsports spawn," she said.

Kharisa countered that Sharn already supports several other rough sports and diversions, including hrazhak and skyblades events. Therefore, bringing the gladiators out into the open ought to reduce crime, not increase it. "Crime thrives in the darkness," she pointed out. "If we make gladiator matches legal, we shine the light on them. The only reason that organized crime has been so prevalent among the gladiators thus far is that we've forced them to operate outside the law."

Other council members, however, questioned Kharisa's motives. "Sava Kharisa wants to make bloodsports legal. Her attitude is hardly surprising, given that her cousin was arrested for attending the Burning Ring just last week," said Thurik Davandi, city council member for Upper Menthis. "I'm just glad he wasn't arrested for robbery, or we'd have to sit through a speech about why purse-snatching should be legal."


Stormhold District Quarantined
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Stormhold District Quarantined after "Redscale" Outbreak Wreaks Havoc

SHARN -- On Wir, the City Watch closed off access to the Stormhold District to keep the mysterious plague known as redscale from spreading to the rest of the city. Watch officers said they didn't know when they'd reopen the district, but that paladins and special agents with magical immunity to the disease were conducting limited surveys of the situation in Stormhold.

More than a thousand Stormhold residents are now confined behind the barriers that the City Watch has erected at all known access points to the district. Magical observation of Stormhold this morning revealed mostly deserted streets and evidence of sporadic looting.

The redscale plague causes victims to develop scaly growths on their faces and hands, and to engage in violent, unpredictable behavior. Before the closure, the City Watch attributed seventeen homicides and more than a hundred arrests to the disease.

Sages of House Jorasco are studying redscale victims in an effort to explain the virulence of the plague. "In the last two weeks, we've made some progress. Traditional anti-disease magic is effective at least some of the time, and we're researching some specific spells that should be completely effective," said Kustobel d'Jorasco. "But since we aren't yet sure how the plague is spread, we have to be very careful when studying the victims."

D'Jorasco further stated that the plague is definitely magical in origin, and that it resists common healing spells. Furthermore, she indicated that the sages had found some evidence that the disease places a magical compulsion on its victims. "One of the most puzzling aspects of redscale is how the victims behave," she said. "They seem to experience a lot of violent urges that cause them to attack others -- even their friends and families. Curiously, however, redscale victims never attack each other -- the victims of their violent acts are always uninfected people. Thus, if you're infected but haven't developed the scales yet, the other plague victims won't attack you."




Bounty on Lightning Rail Raiders
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Orien Offers Bounty on Lightning Rail Raiders

VULYAR, KARNNATH -- House Orien has announced a bounty of 5,000 gold coins on a gang that has been sabotaging lightning rail service between the Karnnathi cities of Vulyar and Irontown. The gang, known by the "Three Fingers" moniker, has robbed the lightning rail three times in the last six months, eluding House Orien guards each time.

Three weeks ago, House Orien blamed the Three Fingers gang for the temporary suspension of rail traffic between Vulyar and Irontown. The shutdown lasted for three days, then additional delays extended it for two days beyond that.

Citing security concerns, the leaders of House Orien refused to discuss the exact reason for the shutdown. But a villager in Yellow Pass, a hamlet near the rail route, stated that a lightning rail carrying ingots from the Mror Holds derailed after dozens of conductor stones were removed from its path. "The officials grabbed every horse and every able-bodied worker in Yellow Pass to help with the cleanup," said the villager, who asked that his name not be used. "Several rail cars were tipped over, and some of them were still on fire, but no ingots remained as far as I could tell."

The villager refused to speculate on how the ingots might have been removed. "If it took dozens of horses and a second lightning rail to haul off the wreck," he said, "I don't know how the Three Fingers could have gotten items as heavy as ingots away from the wreckage."

The bounty should substantially improve the chances of bringing the perpetrators to justice. If would-be bounty hunters don't capture the gang, one of the national armies or dragonmarked houses still might. Karnnath has dispatched extra patrols, including the Company of the Skull, into the area to search for the raiders.

In addition, several dwarf clans within the Mror Holds are negotiating with Korth to provide pursuit parties. "That lightning rail line is our primary connection to the rest of Khorvaire, and we take threats against it as threats against the holds themselves," said Baron Juri Deepspring of Mror.

Meanwhile, House Deneith has offered the services of its Sentinel Marshals to protect the rail line. House Orien officials have assured the public that the lightning rails running the Vulyar-Irontown route now have "unparalleled security."



Murders Tied to Pamphlets
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Sharn Watch Ties Murders to Key of Saranach Pamphlets

SHARN -- On Far, a city watch official revealed that the murder of Lady Kria ir'Tandrika, which occurred in her chambers on Zol, is related to the mysterious pamphlet known as the Key of Saranach. Ir'Tandrika's death is the seventh in the last two months that has been linked to the rare manuscript, which is said to be cursed with ill fortune.

Daggerwatch Garrison Commander Lian Halamar said he would be doubling the number of inquisitives working on the case by the end of the day. Thus far, the investigation has focused on several "citizens of interest," but no suspects have been identified as yet.

Halamar issued two writs of detention on Zol. Though the writs don't accuse the named individuals of crimes, they do give the City Watch the authority to detain those persons for questioning regarding the pamphlet.

The first writ names the author of the Key of Saranach -- a man called Valtreaux the Sage. The City Watch has no description of Valtreaux, nor are his recent whereabouts known.

The second writ names a woman known only as Providence, a frequent speaker in the Commons at Morgrave University. The writ states that Providence was handing out Key of Saranach pamphlets several weeks ago, though she hasn't been seen since. According to Halamar, at least some of the murder victims received the pamphlet from Providence.

A public appeal to turn in copies of the Key of Saranach pamphlet to the City Watch has thus far achieved no results. Ir'Tandrika's copy -- the first acquired so far -- has been turned over to the Blackened Book, the magical investigation unit of the City Watch. Halamar revealed that the pamphlet purports to be a self-guided study of esoteric mystical techniques.

"It's likely that the connection between the pamphlet and the murders is completely mundane -- the rumors of a curse are probably hyperbole," Halamar said. "We don't know how many of these Providence handed out, however, and we'd like to have them all accounted for."

Eldeen Wolves Seize Expedition
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Eldeen Wolves Seize Expedition; Aundair Refuses Talks

WYR, AUNDAIR -- Dozens of archeologists, porters, and laborers from the University of Wynarn have been captured by the Eldeen Wolves, a guerrilla group operating in western Aundair and the eastern Eldeen Reaches.

A missive delivered to Aundair's Otharaunt Fortress demanded that Aundair pull out of the Wynarn River Valley in exchange for the safe return of the expedition. (Since the Eldeen Reaches attained independence, the western banks of the Wynarn River have traditionally been considered the region's border.) A palace official connected to Queen Aurala's diplomatic corps dismissed the missive as "a ranting screed from radicals whose time has passed" and said the crown will never negotiate with kidnappers and guerrillas.

Sentinel Marshals from House Deneith and agents of the Royal Eyes of Aundair are searching for the missing expedition. However, neither House Deneith nor the Aundair crown would provide details of the search, citing the safety of agents in the field as the reason for this secrecy.

The Eldeen Wolves have stepped up their kidnapping, sabotage, and murder operations along Aundair's western border during the past year. Led by a charismatic, mysterious figure known only as Rhunadask, the group operates from bases deep within the wilderness of the Eldeen Reaches and clashes frequently with the Aundairian army.

Despite the most recent kidnappings, residents of western Aundair remain resolute in their opposition to Rhunadask and the Eldeen Wolves. "Pulling out of the valley completely would result in the loss of many prosperous farms and vineyards," said Lord Hauron ir'Trellek, whose family manor sits on the eastern bank of the Wynarn. "But a fundamental principle is at stake here: That land is Aundair soil, and I've already given five sons to make sure that it stays Aundair soil."


Court-Martial Convicts Tardalis
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Court-Martial Convicts Tardalis on Twenty-Four Counts

WROAT -- Colonel Reyva Tardalis drew a sentence of forty years in Dreadhold after a military jury returned convictions on twenty-four of the twenty-six charges levied against him by the crown. The jury found Tardalis guilty of dereliction of duty, inhumane treatment of subordinates, and conduct unbecoming an officer. The jury deadlocked on the two treason charges, either of which would have resulted in public execution of the prisoner.

Tardalis, brought in shackles before Magistrate ir'Aungré on Mol, was calm before the sentence was delivered. But when ir'Aungré instructed the bailiffs to prepare the prisoner for Dreadhold, Tardalis rushed the bench and had to be restrained, first by guards and then with enchantment magic.

Tardalis commanded a Breland regiment on the western front in the mid-980s. But when King Boranel pulled the army back east of the Graywalls, Tardalis refused to retreat. Instead, he constructed a fortress in the Harrkall Valley of what is now Droaam.

Tardalis offered the regiment's protection to settlers who likewise refused to retreat, and his soldiers managed to hold the Harrkall Valley against the hordes of Droaam for almost eight years. The presence of "Tardalis's Regiment" deep within Droaam was a source of pride for the noble families displaced by Breland's retreat, many of whom had been advocating a massive reconquest of the west.

When the Treaty of Thronehold negotiations began in 995, Brelish commandos stormed the Harrkall Valley and took Tardalis and his officer corps into custody. This action ended the ongoing embarrassment of a Brelish military unit that openly refused orders. Some diplomats, however, contend that the raid was also part of a diplomatic effort to bring the Daughters of Sora Kell to the negotiating table at Thronehold -- a conjecture repudiated by the crown.

Upon taking control of the fortress, the commandos found not the orderly encampment depicted in pro-reconquest leaflets, but a community held captive by Tardalis and his soldiers. Detailed reports of the conditions in the Harrkall Valley fortress remain under crown seal, but testimony offered during the court-martial trial alluded to slavery, sadistic punishments, and "unwholesome magical practices."


Security Planned for Barrakas Summit
News for Sul, Nymm 15th, 998
By David Noonan




"Unparalleled" Security Planned for Barrakas Summit

THRONEHOLD -- Kaskell d'Deneith stated on Zol that House Deneith plans to establish a 5-mile "exclusion zone" around the island of Thronehold for the duration of the international summit scheduled there during the first week of Barrakas. As a result of these precautions, maritime traffic throughout Scions Sound will be delayed.

"For the duration of the summit, we plan to cover Thronehold by land, sea, and air," said d'Deneith. "We plan to counter every possible kind of security breach -- from magical surveillance to extraplanar intrusion -- so that Khorvaire's national leaders can focus on negotiations."

Known in diplomatic circles as the Barrakas Summit, this historic meeting is officially called the First Summit of Peace and Reconciliation. Its beginning will mark the first time that Khorvaire's national leaders have gathered in one place since the Treaty of Thronehold was signed two years ago.

But as of now, with less than two months until the summit is scheduled to begin, only King Kaius ir'Wynarn III of Karrnath and Queen Aurala ir'Wynarn of Aundair have committed to attending. Though Breland's King Boranel ir'Wynarn has expressed support for the Barrakas Summit, he has made his attendance contingent on the continued progress of technical negotiations prior to the meeting.

"Negotiations are ongoing with other Khorvaire nations and with the elves of Aundair," said Special Ambassador Hjeltia Petilom of Aundair. "The diplomatic corps of Aundair and Karrnath are handling the day-to-day organization of the summit.

"This meeting represents an unparalleled opportunity for Khorvaire's leaders to come together and chart a course for the future," Petilom continued. "We're confident that the generations to come will look back at the Barrakas Summit and say, 'This is when Khorvaire put its bloody past behind it once and for all.'"



"Mad Mapmaker" on Exhibit at Morgrave
News for Sul, Nymm 15th, 998
By David Noonan




"Mad Mapmaker" on Exhibit at Morgrave

SHARN -- Was Valtreaux the Mad a lunatic prospector or visionary arcanist? Visitors to Morgrave University will have the chance to answer that question for themselves when his maps go on display next week in the Dezina Museum of Antiquities.

Valtreaux is the nom de plume of a dwarf wizard and prospector who traveled the length and breadth of Khorvaire in search of dragonshards some five hundred years ago. His maps are marvels of the mapmaker's art, but their painstaking detail is often obscured by coded references and magical obfuscations.

Several oddities are common to all of Valtreaux's maps. For example, north and south are always reversed, and tiny script around each map compass reads, "Every needle points south as well." In addition, many of his maps include seemingly unnecessary details, such as astronomical charts superimposed on maps of underground caverns.

But these maps are more than just oddities -- they have artistic value as well. Unlike most of his contemporaries, Valtreaux used rare pigments to color his maps, and those hues remain vibrant five centuries later.

Aurak Janirra, Cartography Professor Emeritus at the university, has offered several maps from his private collection for the showing next week. The professor freely admits to a long-standing interest in these maps and their maker.

According to Janirra, Valtreaux earned his "Mad" appellation long after he created his maps. "When Valtreaux retired from prospecting," the professor explained, "he arranged to have his journals published. Because readers found them difficult to comprehend, they began calling him Valtreaux the Mad."

Valtreaux's journals are full of cryptic historical references, allegorical tales, and numerical ciphers. Readers report that the most striking quality of his journals is the simplicity of their language -- in fact, many claim that Valtreaux's writing resembles poems and rhymes written for children.

"Compilations of Journeys of Valtreaux the Mad are still popular among rare book collectors," Janirra said. "The fact that some volumes have been lost to history makes the narrative even more difficult to follow.

"Calling Valtreaux mad is a bit cruel, really," continued Janirra. "Just because we don't fully understand his writings is no reason to assume that his mind was not in full working order. As I have often told my students, it might be more accurate to call us dullards for not understanding his wonderful writing and cartography."


	

Girallons Rage Through Stoneyard
News for Sul, Nymm 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Girallons Rage Through Stoneyard

SHARN -- On Far, several packs of girallons raged through the Stoneyard district of Lower Northedge, leaving thirteen dead or missing and scores of others wounded. City Watch officials reported that more than two dozen of the creatures had been captured or killed in an effort to restore peace to the neighborhood.

As of today, squads of soldiers are still conducting door-by-door searches of the entire district in an effort to round up the remaining girallons. "The origin of these creatures remains under investigation," said Watch Captain Handor Vassineck.

Eyewitnesses reported that the girallons descended from ledges and other high perches shortly after noon on Far. They attacked shoppers at a farmers' market on Green Coin Street, then spread out through the entire district.

"They snapped the neck of Thallia the grocer like a twig, then dragged her off," said Thomo Ghalann, a resident of the district. "They were loping through the city streets, bellowing as they went. Even my nightmares have never been as horrible as what I saw today."

Several Stoneyard residents cited the bravery of a druid known as Teln, who healed many of the wounded and used magic to drive off numerous girallons. At present, however, Teln is among the missing.

"Girallons are four-armed white gorillas known for their carnivorous diet, aggressive territoriality, and feral cunning," said Rhannock Plathekker, Professor of Cryptozoology at Morgrave University. "Even leaving aside the question of what jungle-dwellers were doing in the middle of a city, the girallons' behavior is puzzling," Plathekker said. "In the wild, their social structure doesn't extend beyond a pack of six or so. Furthermore, they generally consume their prey on the spot, rather than dragging it off."


Lhazaar Volcano Erupts
News for Sul, Lharvion 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Lhazaar Volcano Erupts; Scores Feared Lost

REGALPORT -- Mount Cathanikau erupted on Mol, producing a fountain of glowing lava and an ash plume that could be seen from mainland Khorvaire. Tremors from the eruption caused high surf throughout the Lhazaar Principalities, and many low-lying settlements suffered minor structural damage.

A constant rain of embers and ejecta from the eruption has prevented ships from reaching Cathanikau Island, which lies some 500 miles northeast of Port Verge. The island has an indigenous population and is also home to an enclave of kalashtar refugees and a shrine to Onatar.

House Lyrandar and the Diresharks fleet anchored at Port Verge have assembled a joint relief convoy that remains at sea, awaiting the chance to move ashore and search for survivors. But glowing lava flows have already reached the sea on the northwest quarter of the island, and the eruption shows no sign of abating.

In Regalport, Hierophant Druid Tybalt Orenn said he was seeking magical assistance to end the eruption. "An eruption such as this one could last for weeks, but anyone still alive on Cathanikau Island won't survive that long," he said. "I'm communing with my fellow druids, seeking the power to calm the mountain. At the very least, we need to get the relief convoy onto Cathanikau Island and rescue any survivors."

This eruption marks the first significant volcanic activity in or near eastern Khorvaire since the 881 eruption of Jaurakhti Mountain in what is now the Mror Holds.

Cathanikau Island is frequently cited as a possible resting place for the famed Hoard of the Twin Drakes, a pirate treasure that was lost when both Drake brothers perished in 945. However, multiple expeditions in the 950s and 960s uncovered no evidence that the Drakes had ever been there.




	

Anti-Dismantlement Bill Stalls in Parliament
News for Sul, Nymm 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Anti-Dismantlement Bill Stalls in Parliament

WROAT -- Supporters of a bill condemning warforged dismantlement acknowledged on Wir that they don't have the votes to pass the measure as a parliamentary decree. "I have the utmost respect for my fellow members," said Hannval ir'Tenko, a member of parliament from the Old Bandras region, "but I'm disappointed that they're turning a blind eye to a great injustice that is taking place within the borders of this nation."

Dismantlement -- the practice of taking apart criminal warforged -- is no longer practiced in Breland's major cities. However, this form of punishment is still meted out in more rural jurisdictions.

Supporters of ir'Tenko's decree say that imposing what amounts to a death penalty on a warforged who commits a crime is fundamentally unfair -- especially when the sentence for the same crime would be much lighter for a human criminal. Tales abound of warforged who have been dismantled in vigilante fashion because townsfolk suspected them of crimes.

Other members of Parliament hold differing opinions on this issue. "The dismantlement issue is a complex one that shouldn't be simplified into a right-or-wrong debate," said Tannis ir'Yamberra, a member of parliament from Three Rivers. "What we really need to look at is a more fundamental question -- to what degree do we want warforged mixing with the living races? That issue touches on every aspect of Brelish society, so we need to go slowly and respect the traditions that made this land great.

"The warforged did indeed make great contributions to Breland during the Last War," ir'Yamberra continued. "And no one would dispute their value as soldiers. But you don't use a plowshare to trim your beard. Not every tool can adapt to every purpose, and these creatures were clearly designed for war, not peace. Anyone who thinks that warforged fit seamlessly into the Brelish way of life has his head in the sand.

"The crown's Office of Warforged Affairs has been inundated with reports of warforged reverting to wartime behavior and attacking humans without provocation or warning," ir'Yamberra said.

According to ir'Tenko, the decree will be reintroduced in the autumn. At that time, the Breland Parliament is expected to include a number of new faces.




Mykiro Harudden Collapses Onstage
News for Sul, Lharvion 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Mykiro Harudden Collapses Onstage, Then Returns for Encore

SHARN -- Fans of Mykiro Harudden were shocked when the famed singer collapsed on stage last night in the middle of her signature song, "Ravens at Twilight." Harudden had been performing at Kavarrah Concert Hall in the University District in front of a record crowd.

Bodyguards immediately whisked Harudden backstage. Nevertheless, six concertgoers suffered minor injuries when the turbulent crowd rushed the stage.

Approximately 20 minutes later, Harudden returned to complete her song. She also performed a new song, "Crescent Moon," to a diminished but enthusiastic crowd.

The concert marked a return to public life after a six-month absence for Harudden, the emancipated daughter of Duke Kenrou ir'Tallask and one of Sharn's best-known entertainers. Harudden specializes in the balladeer style that has been popular since the end of the Last War.

The public romance between Harudden and Janich d'Phiarlan captivated high society last summer, when the couple made joint musical appearances and performed elaborate dances at Upper Central balls. But d'Phiarlan announced last Vult that "our hearts cannot allow us to perform together anymore," and Harudden has remained in seclusion ever since. House Phiarlan members said that Janich d'Phiarlan is performing in Karrnath this summer and has had no recent contact with Harudden.

Upon returning to the stage, Harudden offered no explanation for either her collapse or her rapid recovery. Neither Harudden nor her manager, Kuirish Otokan, could be reached for comment before press time.


	

Breland Calls for Crackdown
News for Sul, Barrakas 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Breland Calls for Crackdown on Path of the Howl

WROAT -- Breland urged Aundair to crack down on criminals who use a secret network known as the Path of the Howl to escape into the Eldeen Reaches. "The Path of the Howl acts in contravention of justice and law, yet Aundair upholds justice and law as incorruptible virtues," the decree stated. "Breland therefore will offer what assistance it can in ending this stain on Aundair's otherwise laudable rule of law."

The palace decree was issued in response to the recent escapes of several high-profile Breland criminals, who remain at large despite the efforts of the King's Citadel to apprehend them. Jessen Theel, reputed member of a Sharn crime syndicate, escaped from the Citadel's prison on the Central Plateau four weeks ago and hasn't been seen since. A wizard known only as Fathom the Necromancer fled his tower on the southern coast last month before magistrates could question him about some mysterious disappearances in nearby villages. And Elenna ir'Vorshach, scheduled to testify under duress in the parliamentary "Thandrak Scandal," disappeared from custody last week while under house arrest in Galethspyre.

The decree mentions no specific fugitives who have used the Path of the Howl. However, it does state that the Citadel has "substantive and recent" evidence that the path remains active within Aundair's borders.

The Path of the Howl was established in the mid-800s as a safe and secret means of taking lycanthropes and other shapeshifters beyond the reach of a Church of the Silver Flame inquisition. Those fleeing the inquisition reportedly traveled via a network of safehouses and unobtrusive paths from central Galifar northwest to what is now the Eldeen Reaches. Most of the network runs through postwar Aundair.

The Church of the Silver Flame's campaign ended in the late 800s. But shortly thereafter, when the Last War began, the Path of the Howl became an escape route for political enemies of the five new sovereigns who succeeded Jarot, and eventually for deserters and war protesters.

A palace decree indicates the intent of the Brelish government, but it doesn't carry as much diplomatic weight as a crown decree personally drafted by the sovereign. However, palace insiders say that the Path of the Howl might be on the agenda for an upcoming Fairhaven Summit between King Boranel and Queen Aurala, and that the king may address the matter personally at that time.


	

Horacht Sighted at Rekkenmark Graduation
News for Sul, Barrakas 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Horacht Sighted at Rekkenmark Graduation

KORTH -- Breyse Horacht, the Karrnathi general lauded for his daring and condemned for his brutality during the Last War, was sighted on Wir attending a Rekkenmark Academy graduation for naval helmsmen. Academy officials could not confirm Horacht's attendance at the ceremony, which was open to the public.

Horacht faces multiple war crimes charges in Thrane and has already been convicted in absentia by magistrates appointed by Oargev ir'Wynarn, last prince of Cyre. Horacht's whereabouts haven't been publicly known since his retirement from active duty in 995.

"He looked gaunt and walked with a limp, but you don't forget that goatee," said Sigor Lassinus, who briefly served under Horacht as an oarsman in the early 990s. Lassinus, one of the graduates honored that day, said Horacht departed shortly before the ceremony's conclusion and didn't speak with anyone while inside the Academy's Hall of Waves.

Horacht reached prominence in the late 950s after attaining the rank of general. He commanded a combined force of Karnnathi naval vessels and ground troops that raided Cyran, Aundairian, and Thrane coastal cities. In his most daring raid, Horacht took his troops from Cyre across the Brey River and marched them north to capture the Thrane city of Shadukar in a surprise attack.

In 961, Horacht ordered Shadukar put to the torch by Karrnathi troops when a Thrane army attempted to liberate it. The ensuing conflagration killed an estimated 7,000 Thrane civilians. Thrane reprisals during the subsequent "Red Sails for Revenge" campaign included a naval bombardment of Korth.

During the negotiations that led to the Treaty of Thronehold, Thrane demanded that Horacht be turned over for trial. The general went into seclusion shortly thereafter, and the final treaty included no extradition mechanisms for those accused of war crimes.

In the wake of Horacht's reappearance, Thrane is expected to renew calls for his arrest. In the past, Thrane's leaders have variously accused the Karnnathi military, the Security ministry, and the Karnnathi crown itself of harboring Horacht.


	

Ir'Kalain Urges Q'Barran Emigration
News for Sul, Barrakas 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Ir'Kalain Urges Q'Barran Emigration for "True Children of Galifar"

SHARN -- In response to the Breland Parliament's recent Galifaran Heritage resolution, Q'Barran native Joseth ir'Kalain said on Far that his nation, not Breland, is home to those he called the true children of Galifar. "Where else but New Galifar is the flag still flying?" ir'Kalain asked. "Not in Breland, although the members of your Parliament seem intent on wrapping themselves in a flag that's no longer theirs."

The Galifaran Heritage resolution, sent to the crown on an advisory basis, is an effort to rewrite history, ir'Kalain asserted. "The very existence of the Parliament shows that Breland would rather make its own way in the world than return to the splendors of Galifar," he said. "In my nation, we still adhere to the Code of Galifar. There's no parliament, no warmongering, and no need to pass a bill telling people what their heritage is.

"Those who truly admire Galifaran ideals should pack up and head east," ir'Kalain continued. "While life can be hard in Q'Barra, those who emigrate there will be living among honorable neighbors who respect tradition and law.

"New Galifar always has a place for those with honorable hearts -- for those who put their loyalty to Galifar above their own petty desires," ir'Kalain maintained. "Emigration has a practical aspect as well, since recent dragonshard discoveries have poised the region for a prosperous future."

Member of Parliament Hagni ir'Octacles, a sponsor of the Galifaran Heritage resolution, insisted that ir'Kalain defines Galifaran heritage too narrowly. "Nowhere in the resolution do we claim to be the sole heirs of Galifar. To do so would be absurd," she stated. "But it's just as absurd for ir'Kalain to claim that you can't represent Galifar's heritage without falling into lockstep with every article of the Code of Galifar. Galifar was more than its Code, and I want Breland to be a place where we revere the ideals behind the code, not the code itself," she said.


Wyverns Menace Northern Zilargo
News for Sul, Barrakas 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Wyverns Menace Northern Zilargo

OSKILOR -- Nightly wyvern attacks on towns and villages from Revan to Dragonroost have local lords clamoring for intervention from the Triumvirate. "Our militia is simply overmatched -- we've never seen assaults like this," said Gallina Intriak of Reven. "More and more of the creatures seem to come every night, and they're getting bolder."

The gnomes are taking the attacks seriously. "Although no one ventures outside after dark," said Intriak, "the wyverns are prying the roofs off buildings and digging into gnome burrows by force. The creatures attack sporadically throughout the night, then fly north before dawn."

Residents of other settlements in northern Zilargo report similar situations. Most Zil believe that the wyverns are roosting somewhere in the Howling Peaks. If the reports gathered from villages along the foothills are accurate, dozens if not hundreds of wyverns may now be calling the Howling Peaks home.

"Wyverns have long nested in the Howling Peaks, though not in great numbers," said Mackar Hrundiak, a hunter and guide familiar with the region. "You see one from time to time, but usually at a great distance. They're so aggressive that they don't usually share territory with one another. Once a wyvern attacked my horse, then flew back into the air to fight a second wyvern rather than finish what it had started."

However, Hrundiak did have one theory on why the wyverns might now be gathering in one area. "Maybe it's a mating situation," he said. "A whole lot of species throw out the rules when it comes to mating."


	

Fairhaven Plagued by Serial Arsonist
News for Sul, Rhaan 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Fairhaven Plagued by Serial Arsonist

FAIRHAVEN -- A fourth major conflagration this month has left residents of Fairhaven anxious. City guards are determined to find the arsonist responsible before more such incidents occur.

Krilauntha and Sons Tannery on Craver Street caught fire shortly after midnight on Mol. Witnesses reported hearing a rush of air and then a low rumble before fire engulfed the building. The flames rapidly spread to three warehouses nearby, turning the area into an inferno. But because of the late hour, the buildings were deserted when the fire started, so no one was hurt.

Fire crews battled the blaze until late morning. A guard captain investigating the scene said the tannery fire bears "significant similarities" to three previous fires in Fairhaven, including:

A residential fire on Rhaan 3rd that scorched two city blocks in the Laurelbough District, killing fourteen people.
A fire at an under-construction Sovereign Host hospice on Rhaan 6th that spread to a row of nearby inns, leaving four dead and seven badly burned.
A blaze at Hooper's Ear Tavern on Rhaan 8th in which 38 people perished. City guard officials confirmed that the tavern doors had been locked or barred from the outside, preventing escape.
Tannery owner Vadnir Krilauntha has offered a reward of 3,000 gold coins for information leading to the perpetrator's arrest. This amount, says Krilauntha, represents "just about all the family has left."

	

Sabotage Suspected at Bridge Collapses
News for Sul, Rhaan 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Sabotage Suspected in Recent Bridge Collapses

LAKESIDE, KARRNATH -- The recent collapse of Fairregard Bridge over the Iceflow River has disrupted House Orien caravans as well as normal traffic. This bridge is the third to be put out of commission this autumn.

Following a series of groundquakes variously described as "rumbling" or "thumping" by witnesses, the stone center supports of the bridge crumbled and were swept away by the river shortly after noon on Rhaan 10th. The bridge surface then collapsed into the Iceflow and was carried several miles downstream.

Benneth Trogholm, a teamster who narrowly avoided losing his train to the collapse, described his harrowing experience. "I was already pushing my team as fast as I could across the bridge. The ground was shaking, and I wanted no part of that," he said. "But when I was halfway across, I heard the bridge creak and groan as though it were alive! At that point, I just gave the horses their heads. Considering the speed of the collapse, I was really lucky to make it all the way across."

Helshea d'Orien, a caravan master who handles House Orien trade with the settler communities in the Iceflow River delta, said the collapse of Fairregard Bridge seemed suspicious. Two other bridges across the Iceflow have also collapsed in the past month, although no witnesses have emerged to describe the circumstances. "These are war-era bridges, but they didn't sustain a lot of battle damage," she said. "And the Iceflow isn't running high right now, so it's not like they're getting flooded out. Someone is deliberately taking out these bridges, one by one."

House Orien's leaders plan to hire guards for the two remaining bridges over the Iceflow River. "As it is," said d'Orien in explanation of this decision, "the loss of three bridges has added a week to travel time between the Lakeside and the delta settlers. And the remaining bridges are too small to support heavy caravan traffic."

	

Anticipation Builds for New Roll of Honor
News for Sul, Rhaan 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Anticipation Builds for New Roll of Honor

WROAT -- Guildmasters, war heroes, and other prominent citizens of Breland are awaiting the autumn Roll of Honor with great interest. This document, issued by the crown every quarter, grants noble titles to those who have served Breland with distinction. Aides to King Boranel confirmed that the list of newly minted nobles is nearly complete and should be released by general proclamation within the next two weeks.

Boranel's spring and summer Rolls of Honor included many successful merchants and guildmasters. The elevation of such citizens to the nobility is believed to be a conscious effort on the crown's part to tie Breland's mercantile power to its political power.

Prior to this year, the seasonal Rolls of Honor included many army officers and war heroes. But while this season's list will undoubtedly have a military component, the officer corps is no longer likely to dominate it. "If you earned a noble title in the war, you probably have it by now," said Estellan ir'Napenthe, a heraldic scholar and expert on noble affairs.

According to ir'Napenthe, the number of names on the list will also bear close watching. Previous lists have given noble titles -- and accompanying land deeds -- to hundreds of people. But most of the estates made vacant by war have now been reallocated.

"Only about two dozen worthy estates remain -- mostly manors that wound up in crown hands after succession disputes, or simply because the war claimed all possible heirs," ir'Napenthe said. "If King Boranel wants to grant land beyond those estates, he'll have to tap into crown holdings. Thus, it's likely that many of the new lords created by the autumn Roll of Honor will receive noble titles but no land."

ower 312 is Missing
News for Sul, Rhaan 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Tower 312 is Missing

SHARN -- Architects, magicians, and City Watch officers were baffled on Far when Tower 312, a twisting spire in the Dava Gate district, disappeared completely overnight.

Tower 312 included four upscale residences, a private library, a cartography shop, and a private bathhouse. City records indicate that it had eleven permanent residents, although the Sharn Watch hasn't yet been able to confirm which of them were present at the time of the disappearance. However, Nirram Unslaguel, owner of Meridian Cartography, is definitely among the missing. He did not reside in Tower 312, but family members said he was working late in his shop when the tower disappeared.

Tower 312 was built on balconies and buttresses from Jenzherr Tower. But while Jenzherr Tower continues up into the Mithral Tower district, Tower 312 never supported anything skyward. The buttresses connecting Tower 312 to Jenzherr Tower are gone, and the walls of the latter structure are smooth, as if the buttresses had never been present at all. The support beams and walkways connecting Tower 312 to Calsin Tower have likewise disappeared, leaving no evidence of their existence.

The Blackened Book branch of the Sharn Watch is leading the investigation into this incident. Lady Warden Maira ir'Talan said preliminary investigations indicated the use of powerful abjuration and conjuration magic. "The authorities are treating the disappearance of the tower as a missing persons case, possibly involving misuse of magic," she said.

Dragonshard Prices Skyrocket
News for Sul, Sypheros 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Dragonshard Prices Skyrocket

SHARN -- Prices for raw dragonshards have almost doubled in recent weeks, leaving shard brokers with scant supplies but hefty profits. Though dragonshards are not available in public markets, they are common in the exclusive, private auction houses in the Korranath district.

Jessen Urtannek, owner of Silverpick Prospecting, said that his company has recently had production difficulties in both the Shadow Marches and Q'Barra. Thus, bidders are competing for a smaller supply of dragonshards, and prices are rising.

"We're happy with the output from our Shadow Marches operations, but we've lost two returning caravans somewhere in Droaam," he said. "Banditry there is fierce, and even caravan masters who pay local warlords for protection are suffering losses. Even though getting cargo through Droaam is expensive, we can easily recoup these costs at the auction house. What's frustrating for me as a business owner, though, is paying out protection money and not getting the protection.

"For future shipments, Silverpick Prospecting will examine other shipping options, including sea or air transport through House Lyrandar," Urtannek continued. "Increasing the guard escort for the caravans is also a possibility, though a risky one."

In Q'Barra, the supply problem is simpler -- lizardfolk are attacking prospecting operations directly. "They wait for us to do the hard work, then they come out of the jungle, kill everyone working on the site, and abscond with whatever isn't nailed down," Urtannek said.

Dragonshard broker Pavlika Grihl said that supply disruptions are only exacerbating a surge in demand for the dragonshards, which have a variety of magical applications. "A number of arcanists and their representatives from the dragonmarked houses are always in the market for most dragonshard grades. But new buyers also seem to be coming out of the woodwork. They have money to spend, and they're indiscriminate about what dragonshards they're buying," she said.

Grihl speculated that the newcomers to the dragonshard auction houses are probably commodity speculators. "Outside of powerful magicians and the houses, no one can really use dragonshards," she said. "So I've got to believe that we're going to see all these dragonshards return to the market once the speculators get nervous and think the price bubble is going to burst."


House Lyrandar Mulls New Airship Routes
News for Sul, Sypheros 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




House Lyrandar Mulls New Airship Routes

STORMHOME -- Airship travelers may soon be able to reach such varied destinations as Starilaskur, Sigilstar, Adderport, Keth, and Stormreach on the Xen'drik coast if House Lyrandar leaders approve an ambitious program of docking tower construction. Yarrick d'Lyrandar, an influential scion of the house, has been negotiating with local leaders for airship towers in those areas, said sources familiar with the negotiations.

Refusing to discuss expansion of the airship routes, Lyrandar officials referred to Yarrick d'Lyrandar's negotiations as "internal house business." Yarrick d'Lyrandar has been traveling aboard the Lyrandar River of Stars airship, which is due to depart Sharn tomorrow.

Lyrandar airships currently connect most of Khorvaire's capital cities and metropolises. Other destinations are available only to those who can afford extraordinary chartering fees, and airship captains flying charters generally have to make do with whatever moorings they can improvise. Chartered airships to Stormreach often tie up at the lighthouse south of the city, for example.

One question that remains unanswered is whether the expansion would entail the commissioning of new Lyrandar airships, including some long-rumored behemoth airships that dwarf the existing 300-foot standard. Airship architects in Zilargo have been experimenting since the latter years of the Last War with elemental binding techniques that would provide sufficient lift to launch such vessels.

Duke ir'Askranno Sentenced to Dreadhold
News for Sul, Sypheros 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Duke ir'Askranno Sentenced to Dreadhold After Rambling Confession

Duke ir'Askranno Sentenced to Dreadhold after Rambling Confession SHARN -- Before his sentence was handed down, convicted murderer Duke Rellen ir'Askranno blamed his killing spree last month on mind control by the Cult of the Twin Suns. Speaking before magistrate Carkell Anathamn, ir'Askranno wept, shouted, and tore up documents held by his barrister while delivering a 20-minute rambling speech.

"It was all the Twin Suns!" ir'Askranno cried. "I loved my family, and I would never have done anything to hurt them. But they got in my head, and they made me -- oh, gods, I can't believe it! The Twin Suns are everywhere -- probably in this courtroom. I know they're working among the Sixty Families, trying make us do -- well, terrible things! Terrible!" The duke's statement surprised court watchers, who had grown accustomed to ir'Askranno's stony silence during court proceedings.

Crown barrister Bhalla Quenthir dismissed ir'Askranno's claim as the ravings of a deranged mind. "Frankly, these ramblings aren't worth repeating," she said. "If some pernicious cult did have its fingers in every aspect of Sharn society, our investigation would have uncovered at least a hint of it."

Investigators from the Sharn Watch's Blackened Book unit used extensive divination magic on ir'Askranno after his arrest at the scene. Spellcasters found no evidence of enchantment magic, nor did their investigation indicate that any others had been present.

"And I would like to point out that we still don't know where the body of ir'Askranno's daughter is," Quenthir continued. "If he were truly contrite, he could at least tell us what happened to her."

After delivering his unusual statement, the duke was sentenced to life in the island prison of Dreadhold.

Karrnathi Necro-Arsenals Remain Hidden
News for Sul, Aryth 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Karrnathi Necro-Arsenals Remain Hidden

WROAT -- Members of Breland's Parliament are clamoring for the public release of a War Council report contending that Karrnath maintains "necro-arsenals" beyond its postwar borders, and that at least one of these lies in northern Breland. According to sources within Parliament, a copy of this report has been circulating among the members for several days.

One person who has read the report told Sharn Inquisitive that a band of Breland army veterans uncovered a necro-arsenal last month in northern Breland while chasing down rumors of buried war gold. These veterans, whose names had been redacted from the report, evidently found a secret entrance to an underground fortress full of Karrnathi zombie soldiers and weapons. This hidden emplacement also included a functional smithy and several other chambers apparently used for unspecified necromantic purposes.

Most of the soldiers within the fortress were not animated, but the veterans did clash with the necro-arsenal's few active guardians. The band took heavy casualties in the fight, but a few survivors managed to flee. After tending to their wounds, they reported their discovery at the Breland Army's outpost at Sword Keep. Papers they took from the necro-arsenal's map room hint at the existence of similar hidden fortresses at other points along the path of the Karnnathi army's advances during the Last War -- most of which now lie within Aundair, Thrane, and the Mournland.

If necro-arsenals remain beyond Karrnath's borders, their existence would violate the Treaty of Thronehold. The strategic purpose of such emplacements remains unknown, although Karrnathi military doctrine has traditionally emphasized keeping large forces in tactical reserve.

Representatives of the Breland Crown and the Karrnathi diplomatic mission were unavailable to comment on the necro-arsenal report. Karrnath's ambassador to the Breland Crown was reputedly recalled to Korth last week for "routine consultations."

Early Snows Close Graywall Passes
News for Sul, Aryth 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Early Snows Close Graywall Passes

ARDEV -- An unseasonable snowstorm has dropped nearly 4 feet of snow on the Graywall passes, rendering land travel west from Breland impossible. Col. Kincaid Relaustra, speaking from Castle Arakhain, reported on the conditions. "Magical communications from snowbound citadels in the Graywalls indicate that all passes between western Breland and Droaam are impassible to wagon traffic," he said. "Some of the northern passes may be manageable on foot, although the avalanche risk would make such a journey perilous."

According to Relaustra, the volume of snow will likely keep the passes closed for at least two weeks. But if this unseasonably frigid weather persists, the passes could remain closed all winter.

Winter weather hasn't completely closed the Graywall passes since 988 YK. Many western Brelanders maintain that House Lyrandar was paid to augment the snowstorms this year by the Brelish Crown, which wanted a respite from attacks by marauders from Droaam. But both the Brelish Crown and House representatives dismiss such speculation as "typical wartime rumors."

Incursions from Droaam, while more sporadic than they were in the later years of the Last War, have been a thorn in the side of the Breland Army's Western Command recently. Now, just as in 988, the snowstorms are expected to prevent orc and ogre raiders from reaching western Breland.

Relaustra acknowledged the reduced danger from Droaam but noted that the snows present a security concern as well. "Many of the Brelish border citadels can't be reinforced until the snows recede," he pointed out. "A lot of the towers are already snowed in. The soldiers should have plenty of food and firewood, but they can't march out, and I can't march more troops in."

"Lilygatherer" Corruption Trial Opens
News for Sul, Vult 8th, 998
By David Noonan




"Lilygatherer" Corruption Trial Opens

SHARN -- On Wir, five city council staffers, including the chief of staff to Councillor Borian Haldorak, went on trial for corruption, bribery, and narcotic trafficking. Central to the case is the charge that the staffers used their political influence to run a dreamlily smuggling and distribution network that stretched into some of Sharn's toniest neighborhoods.

"Over the coming weeks, we'll be presenting incontrovertible evidence that these officials used their positions to bribe members of the City Watch, forge customs manifests, and cover up their own involvement in a massive dreamlily ring," Crown Barrister Ulrich Thomossak promised. "And based on the testimony delivered, we may uncover other conspirators as well. If we do, I can guarantee additional arrests, trials, and convictions."

Three of the five staffers currently report to Borian Haldorak of Upper Dura. Since the investigation became public two weeks ago, Haldorak has steadfastly maintained that he had no knowledge of any illegal activities performed by his subordinates. "With two hundred years of practice under my belt, I accounted myself a good judge of character," Haldorak said. "That's why I grieve to learn of the charges against some of the colleagues I trusted to handle the affairs of this great city."

Haldorak refused to speculate on the guilt or innocence of his staffers. "I will continue to cooperate with the Thomossak investigation in any way I can throughout the trial," he said. "I would caution everyone involved, however, to let the wheel of justice turn as it may, and not to assign guilt or innocence until the trial's conclusion."

Countess ir’Hilyark Flees Wedding
News for Sul, Vult 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Countess ir’Hilyark Flees Wedding; Whereabouts Unknown

FAIRHAVEN—The Hilyark family is searching for Countess Kehrlique ir’Hilyark, who disappeared from the family compound in Fairhaven on Zol, the eve of her wedding.

The bride’s father, Jarran ir’Hilyark, pleaded for information about his daughter’s whereabouts.

“I know everyone thinks this is a case of ‘cold feet,’ but my daughter has been looking forward to this day for years,” he said. “Tongues are wagging about this, but I ask you to remember that this girl has a mother worried sick about her. She has a six-year-old brother who wants to search every house in Fairhaven, tears in his eyes.”

“Please, if you know where my daughter is, tell us. We only want to know that she’s safe,” he said.

Because Kehrlique attended Morgrave University in Sharn and has many friends in the city, she may have traveled to Breland, Jarran ir’Hilyark said.

Vandrich d’Orien, ir’Hilyark’s fiancé, has promised House Orien’s assistance in making sure his bride is found safe.

House Orien agents are interviewing everyone involved with the wedding but keeping a low profile, guests said.

“It’s a bit awkward to have the groom’s family hunting for the bride,” one prominent wedding guest said on condition of anonymity. “On the one hand, of course they should help. On the other hand, maybe the bride doesn’t want to be found by the groom.”

The postponed wedding marks another blow to the fortunes of the Hilyark family. Last month, the Hilyarks lost a land dispute covering thousands of acres of prime vineyards between Passage and Bluevine. Kehrlique ir’Hilyark’s maternal uncle, Corso ir’Hilyark, was among the passengers on the Blue Malia, sunk this summer in Scions Sound. And a Hilyark-financed bridge over the Aundair river northeast of Fairhaven, intended as a gift to the crown, has had work halted several times due to cost overruns.

Also missing from the Hilyark compound are Nendra Bachain, a Hilyark family servant, and Macham Turrisaud, Kerlique ir’Hilyark’s bodyguard.

Watch Promises Extra Patrols 
News for Sul, Vult 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Watch Promises Extra Patrols for Long Shadows

SHARN -- The city will be well protected against criminals during the upcoming nights of the Long Shadows (Vult 26th through 28th), according to Lord Commander Iyan ir'Talan. "The Sharn Watch remains vigilant throughout the year, and Long Shadows is no exception," asserted ir'Talan on Sar. "City residents can take comfort in knowing that they're safe in their homes with the Watch on guard."

Commander ir'Talan said patrols would be increased by one-quarter during Long Shadows nights. Furthermore, the Daggerwatch Garrison plans to augment patrols in the Dura quarter by one-half.

"I'd like to commend my watch commanders for the success of last year's Shadows at Bay operation, during which the Watch arrested more than a thousand criminals during Long Shadows," ir'Talan said. "And I can promise an even safer city this year."

But Councillor Sava Kharisa maintains that the high number of arrests during Long Shadows last year is evidence of failure, not success. "In the Lower Central district, armed gangs ran wild and took over the streets at night," she said. "Where was the Watch? Locked behind the doors of the garrisons. For every arrest the Watch officers made, two other criminals ran through the streets of Sharn unimpeded."

Kharisa also pointed out that some of the high-profile crimes from last year's Long Shadows -- including the ritual murders at Bluebrick Spire -- still remain unsolved a year later.

Commander ir'Talan said that while agents of the Blackened Book would doubtless be active throughout Long Shadows, few arrests have historically been made for crimes involving the supernatural. "Long Shadows carries with it a lot of superstition, and events such as the Bluebrick Spire case feed on that kind of hysteria," he said. "But garden-variety criminals are using Long Shadows as an excuse for their own nefarious activities -- it's not a case of monsters running amok."

The Sharn Inquisitive plans a special report on Long Shadows unrest in a later issue.

Arranash Execution Set for Midnight
News for Sul, Zarantyr 15th, 998
By David Noonan




Arranash Execution Set for Midnight

SHARN -- Sesko Arranash, who was convicted of treason last month for attempting to sell information about Argonth's magical defenses, will be executed by hanging tonight at midnight. "Arranash will pay the ultimate price for his traitorous scheme," said Knight-Marshal Banarak Tithon. "And the nation of Breland will sleep better tonight knowing that no one can escape its justice."

Scaffolding for the Arranash execution is being erected today in front of Andith Tower in the Ambassador Towers district. The public is invited to witness the execution. Knights of the King's Citadel said that because Arranash is a powerful spellcaster, he will be bound, gagged, and blindfolded prior to the hanging.

Arranash's hanging marks the first execution in Sharn for a crime committed after the end of the Last War. According to testimony presented before a special crown magistrate, Arranash used divination magic to breach magical security around Argonth, Breland's floating city-fortress. He then attempted to contact numerous foreign governments to set up an auction in which he could sell the information he had gained to the highest bidder.

Arranash allegedly knew how to enter Argonth undetected and how to force it to the ground, according to court testimony. But agents of the King's Citadel intercepted plans for the auction and apprehended Arranash in his tower northeast of Sharn.

"As midnight passes," said Tithon, "all Breland should remember the names of Arrak Slocurr, Kendrick d'Deneith, and a warforged known as Pym, all of whom died during the battle at Arranash's tower. Those three brave souls perished bringing Arranash to justice, and his death tonight will validate their sacrifice."


Shipwreck Survivors Launched Distress Call
News for Sul, Zarantyr 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Bitter Sea Shipwreck Survivors Launched Distress Call

REKKENMARK -- Thrane's ambassador to Karrnath has informed the Crown that a magic distress signal has been received from the Perfect Chicane -- now three weeks overdue from a whaling expedition in the Bitter Sea. According to Ambassador Tellek ir'Uther, a Silver Flame templar stationed in southern Thrane received a sending spell from his estranged brother, who had left home last year to seek his fortune at sea.

The message allegedly went as follows: "Brother, aid me. We struck iceberg northwest of Gurrney's Point. Ship and most crew are lost. We cling to iceberg. So huge... so cold. Help..."

This report lifts the hopes of the sailors' families and focuses the rescue efforts of the Karrnath Navy and House Lyrandar, which volunteered several wind galleons for the search.

Admiral Vurth Harranacht said the message from the Perfect Chicane's crew was good fortune indeed. "Even as I speak," he said, "ships are sailing from Gurrney's Point, and we're making every effort to get spellcasters aboard those ships to aid in the search. The fact that the whole sea is fogged in right now makes the search a lot more difficult -- not to mention dangerous for the searchers.

But Harranacht cautioned against unrealistic expectations as well. "Two things still worry me," he said. "The first is the weather. It's foggy and cold out there, and we don't have any idea what kind of condition the survivors were in when they sent the message.

"The second issue is the timing," he continued. "That distress call is almost 48 hours old, and it'll take time to move our ships closer to Gurrney's Point. A major eastward current runs out there too, and an iceberg caught in it could be leagues away by now."


Flamewind Issues Annual Riddle 
News for Sul, Zarantyr 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Flamewind Issues Annual Riddle of the Three Stars

SHARN -- For the third year in a row, the Morgrave University gynosphinx known as Flamewind plans to tell her "riddle of the three stars" to anyone with 50 gold coins. The gynosphinx will begin granting private audiences at noon tomorrow to deliver the riddle. As this issue of Sharn Inquisitive went to press, dozens of people were already in line in front of Lareth Hall, awaiting their turn to hear the puzzle.

Flamewind's riddles are generally multipart puzzles that take treasure-seekers throughout Sharn in search of a chest full of coins and gems that she's hidden somewhere in the city. Two years ago, her riddle sent the city into an uproar for three weeks while Sharn residents pored over the clues and scoured every nook and cranny of the city for the treasure. The inaugural winner, a mendicant monk named Guptra One-Eye, parleyed her fortune into a glittering spire in Mithral Tower and marriage into the ir'Callandu family.

Last year, a group of Morgrave University students solved Flamewind's riddle in only six days, amid persistent rumors that they had used magical divinations to bypass many of the riddle's challenges. But good luck didn't follow their sudden fortune -- in fact, three of the winners died within the last year. One of the two surviving winners, Talia Churchend, is presently incarcerated in the Citadel for her part in an unsuccessful murder-for-hire scheme against the other survivor, singer Nulio Anachram.

In brief remarks to Sharn Inquisitive, Flamewind refused to discuss the tactics of past winners directly but expressed confidence in the "active countermeasures" she's deployed against those who try to skip steps in the trail of riddles. Flamewind further stated that she didn't object to contestants sharing the initial riddle with others, but only those who have paid the entrance fee and heard the initial riddle are eligible for the riches to which it leads.




Karrnath Decries New Elf Fortress in Talenta
News for Sul, Olarune 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Karrnath Decries New Elf Fortress in Talenta Plains

VULYAR -- Countess Xeria ir'Borutau called on the elves of Valenar to cease construction of a fortress southeast of Vulyar immediately, calling the structure "a provocation that mighty Karrnath cannot ignore." Speaking during a general court audience on Zor, the countess said she was planning to petition Korth for an immediate military response to the fortress.

"No elf community exists within a two-day ride of the fort they're building, so they can't trot out the tired old self-defense claim they're so fond of," she pointed out. "This fort, if completed, will be a dagger pointed directly at the heart of eastern Karrnath."

Vulyar's city militia is moving to a war footing at ir'Boratau's direction. The countess further stated that she's considering a supplemental levy to fund a mercenary cadre. "We can muster quite a bit of support locally right away, and I expect all of Karrnath to be behind us once word gets out," she said. "The Valenars have made a grave error, and the sooner they realize it, the better."

Warchief Shulach Miritarn in Taer Valaestas said that ir'Borutau was engaged in what he called provincial saber-rattling. "The Valaes Tairn have no designs on Karrnath," he said. "But we will defend our heritage to the death. And I hope this Karrnathi countess never has to learn the lesson inherent in those words."

Miritarn further stated that the fortress in question isn't being built so much as restored from its ruined state. "These forts -- we call them taers -- were guarding these lands long before humans ever conceived of Khorvaire, let alone Karrnath. The Karrnathis are the interlopers, not the Valeas Tairn," he asserted.

"The humans and halflings of eastern Karrnath and the Talenta Plains can go about their peaceful business with no interference from the elves," continued Miritarn. "But if the Karrnathis threaten the reconstruction of this taer, we'll paint the plains red with their blood."




Silver Flame Protests at Morgrave University
News for Sul, Olarune 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Silver Flame Protests at Morgrave University Enter Fourth Day

SHARN -- The ongoing religious protest against Provost Dannad Mourain entered its fourth day on Far. Angry worshipers of the Silver Flame called on Morgrave University to fire the controversial historian.

Several hundred protesters crammed into the Commons atop Breland Spire, alternating between hymns to the Silver Flame and a series of oratories that castigated Mourain for his views on the origin of the Church of the Silver Flame. The crowds are growing larger each day, displacing more and more of the students who use the open-air court to eat and study.

Mourain has drawn the ire of the Church of the Silver Flame for his authorship of an academic paper contending that the church is a theological descendant of a Xen'drik serpent cult. Mourain said that an exhaustive retranslation of the Serpentes Fragments reveals an ancient religion that mirrors the modern-day Church of the Silver Flame to "a degree that boggles the imagination."

High priest Yurik Rendrich, one of yesterday's protest speakers, called Mourain's paper heresy, incitement to hatred, and appallingly bad scholarship. "One way or another, the Silver Flame will burn away dross like Dannad Mourain," he told the cheering crowd. "This church isn't ascended from snakes -- it is the living embodiment of creation's primal spark. All those whose souls have been touched by the Silver Flame know an everlasting truth that Mourain can't poison with his words."

With a full slate of orators scheduled for tomorrow, the protests at Morgrave University aren't likely to end anytime soon. The protestors have been peaceful for the most part, though scattered reports of fistfights between Silver Flame worshipers and university students have surfaced.

Each of the various sects and groups that make up the Church of the Silver Flame is vying with all the others to take a more prominent role in the Morgrave University protests. But the church leadership sounded a more cautious note on Far. Archierophant Ythana Morr said that the Church wasn't organizing the protests directly but would continue to monitor events at Morgrave University. She praised the faith and conviction of the protestors in a written statement yesterday. She didn't mention Mourain directly, referring only to only to "those beneath contempt, casting about in darkness and constricted by lies."

University chancellors refused comment on the protests or on Mourain's status with the university. Most classes are continuing as scheduled, but those taught by Mourain have been cancelled until further notice.

Mourain hasn't been seen in public since his paper was released last week. One of his research assistants, speaking on condition of anonymity, said that Mourain had gone into seclusion because he was worried about a backlash from extremist elements of the Church of the Silver Flame.




Valley of Obelisks Girds for Gathering
News for Sul, Olarune 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Valley of Obelisks Girds for Sunthaw Gathering


XANDRAR—Hundreds of pilgrims are expected to descend on the river town of Sumberton next week, awaiting the thaw of Lake Daggerchill with song, dance, and joyous celebration.

The travelers, members of the “Benevolent Order of the Southern Sun,” make the trek annually to the banks of the Daggerchill River. The gathering sometimes lasts for weeks if a cold snap prevents the lake’s annual fall.

“Many of us bring our families [to Sunthaw]—it’s great for children to step away from their chores for a few weeks and remember what’s truly important: the joyous turning of winter into spring,” said Jurri Sensanack, Lodge Master for the Benevolent Order’s Xandrar chapter.

While in Sumberton, members of the Benevolent Order will arise before dawn to “Sing the Sun Awake,” an elaborate choral performance involving hundreds of singers from all over southern Khorvaire.

Many will also visit the crumbling obelisks that dot the farmland in the Daggerchill River valley—the structures that give the region its name.

“I obviously have an interest in ancient history, or I wouldn’t be a member of the Benevolent Order,” Sensanack said. “The obelisks are a tangible reminder that whatever our day-to-day problems are, we’re all part of something much greater. Something much older.”

The Benevolent Order of the Southern Sun takes great pride in its heritage. Members can trace their ancestry to ancient forebears from the mysterious continent of Sarlona who settled Khorvaire thousands of years ago.

“The Sunthaw festival is a touchstone to that rich heritage. It’s as accurate a recreation of an ancient Sarlonan festival as we can create,” Sensanack said.



Lucky Sabletufts’ Stolen from Art Patron
News for Sul, Olarune 1st, 998
By David Noonan




‘Lucky Sabletufts’ Stolen from Crystal Bridge Art Patron


SHARN—Two jade statuettes depicting sabletuft housecats were taken on Zul from Kant Manor in the Crystal Bridge district.

Owner Haras Kant said he planned to offer a reward for the statuettes’ return that “would stagger the imagination.” He further warned the thieves that the statuettes would be impossible to sell due to their notoriety among art collectors.

“Everyone art dealer from here to Korth knows that I’m the rightful owner. Whoever took my cats will find that they’ve taken something that will bring them only trouble,” Kant said.

The statues, known to art patrons as the “Lucky Sabletufts,” are made of a peculiar dark-green jade. They have large rubies for their eyes and diamond-studded claws.

The “lucky” appellation for the statuettes is at least 300 years old. In prewar Sharn, Hansa d’Orien frequently brought the statuettes with her to various casinos, claiming they brought her good fortune at the gaming tables.

The statuettes remained in House Orien hands until they were purchased by Tybalt ir’Rhannock in a private auction shortly after the start of the Last War. When Breland commissioned ir’Rhannock as a naval officer, he brought the Lucky Sabletufts with him to sea. His war galley, the Providential Order, went down with all hands during the Battle of Mannasher’s Point in 985. But ir’Rhannock’s footlocker containing the statuettes was recovered amid the flotsam after the battle.

The Lucky Sabletufts were thus the property of the Breland Navy until a war surplus auction last year. Kant purchased them and has prominently displayed them in private but well-attended art exhibits throughout the fall and winter.

Belen Yorgan, commander of the city watch’s Sword Point garrison, said that a thorough investigation of the theft was under way.

“I have every confidence that we’ll quickly apprehend the thieves and return the sabletufts to their rightful owner,” he said.

Arson Suspected in String of Shop Fires
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Arson Suspected in String of Alchemist Shop Fires


SHARN--Five alchemist shops in the Cassan Bridge district have burned to the foundation in the last three weeks, and with high winds expected this week, district residents are worried that further blazes might spread.

Four of the five shops were owned by recent immigrants from the Shadow Marches, raising the specter of the anti-immigrant violence that flared up two years ago. But the fifth shop, Elixirs of Causewary, has been doing business on Wary Street for almost a century.

Because alchemists use open flame and caustic reagents in their mixtures, uncontrolled fires are not uncommon. Investigations into the specific origins of each fire are underway by the Sharn Watch, but no conclusions are available yet.

But the frequency of the fires leaves little doubt in the minds of Cassan Bridge residents that arson is to blame.

“I’ve had bucket brigades outside my window twice in the past two weeks,” district resident Unnao Thruan said. “You can’t tell me it’s just a coincidence.”

Watch Commander Silaena Cazal said shopkeepers in the district can do their part by cooperating with the city watch during their investigations.

“Whenever the public safety is threatened, we all have to make sacrifices. I hope that all of Cassan Bridge can pull together and end this unfortunate string of fires as soon as possible,” she said.

Revival of Wyvern Hunt Takes 12 Wyverns
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Revival of Q’barran Wyvern Hunt Takes 12 Wyverns


NEWTHRONE—For the first time since the start of the Last War, aristocrats from across Khorvaire traveled to Q’Barra this month to hunt the reclusive, deadly silver wyverns.

The wyverns, possessed of uncommon cunning and a virulent poison, claimed 16 lives among the forty teams of hunters assembled at the invitation of King Sebastes ir’Kesslan.

But with a record 12 wyverns taken during the hunt, ir’Kesslan declared the hunt a “resounding success.”

In a decree from the under-construction royal manor at Adderport, ir’Kesslan singled out three teams in particular for their hunting prowess.

A group led by Aundair’s Thonan ir’Barandeau claimed the largest wyvern—one with a wingspan measuring 28 feet.

House Deneith’s team, led by Ruhillia d’Deneith, presented the king with the first wyvern-head, acquired after only six hours of hunting.

And a hunter from the Eldeen Reaches known only as “Thousand” presented the king with a silver wyvern that he said he hunted without the aid of a team. His claim was obviously unverifiable, but King ir’Kesslan lavished praise on him in the decree.

Royal courtiers said the king was sufficiently pleased with the wyvern hunt that he planned on making it an annual event, as it was in the days of old Galifar. Persistent rumors further indicate that the king may don hunting garb and join the other hunters in the field next year.

Guildhouse Robber Standoff Continues
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




Guildhouse Robber Standoff Continues; Fate of Captives Uncertain


SHARN—The standoff between a band of thieves and the Sharn Watch at Dragon Tower’s Jeweler Guildhouse reached a second day, but the fate of approximately two dozen captives within the guildhouse remains unknown.

Sharn Watch Commander Belew Yorgan refused questions at the scene. The Sharn Watch has closed Martelluk Bridge, Jarrniki’s Span, Crush Street and four blocks of Warren Street, and more than fifty members of the watch maintain a close vigil on the guildhouse.

A Watch sergeant, speaking on condition of anonymity, said that talks between the Sharn Watch and the thieves barricaded in the guildhouse are ongoing but sporadic.

The Watch believes that more than a dozen thieves remain within the guildhouse, including some wounded in the initial clash with guildhouse guards. Their identity remains unknown, although unconfirmed rumors throughout Dragon Towers say the thieves are members of the notorious “Bloodshot Crew.”

The Jeweler’s Guild crisis began in the early hours of Sar, when a heavily armed band of thieves infiltrated the guildhouse, intent on plundering its wealth. A battle with guild guards ensued, spilling out into Crush Street and drawing the attention of the Sharn Watch. The thieves returned to the guildhouse and barricaded themselves inside, taking several guild guards and apprentice jewelers captive.

Complicating any rescue attempts are the guildhouse’s many defenses, including traps and magically warded doors. Guild masters say they are coordinating their efforts with the City Watch, but that the thieves apparently turned some of the traps against the guild guards during the initial break-in.

	

Quarantine Lifted for Smoky Towers
News for Sul, Therendor 1st, 998
By David Noonan




‘Silent Plague’ Quarantine Lifted for Smoky Towers


SHARN—The Sharn Watch lifted the quarantine for the Smoky Towers district at dawn today, saying the baffling “Silent Plague” is not contagious.

The Watch’s Blackened Book investigators still seek the source of the mysterious affliction, which leaves its victims pale and unable to speak.

“Our magical investigations have confirmed that the name ‘Silent Plague’ is actually a misnomer. It’s a curse, not a disease,” said Kareyn Allandidor, senior inquisitive for the Blackened Book.

So far forty-two residents of the district suffer from the Silent Plague. Among the victims are Mardan Kluhir, Jordren d’Phiarlan, “Needles” Norrick, Gransha Fleetfinger, and several other noted singers.

But the Silent Plague isn’t limited to the entertainers. Unndro Bhalask, special assistant to Councillor Caskar Halavik, has the affliction.

Most of the Silent Plague’s victims remain in seclusion. The Sharn Inquisitive will continue its efforts to find and interview (in writing) one or more of the plague victims.

The lifting of the quarantine means that the Children’s Charity Parade scheduled for Zul can keep to its traditional route through the district. Parade organizer Thanim Lariendas said a high turnout is expected despite lingering fears about the Silent Plague.

“I appreciate the Watch being careful with our health—no one wants the plague,” he said. “The Watch says that Smoky Towers is perfectly safe, and the children have been looking forward to this parade all year.”

	

Carnival of the Sublime Opens Next Week
News for Sul, Eyre 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Carnival of the Sublime Opens Next Week


FAIRHAVEN—House Thuranni’s “Carnival of the Sublime” returns next week for its annual visit to Fairhaven, with Carnival organizers promising “more music, more magic, more fun.”

This year a massive tent city southwest of the city will host the carnival, as House Thuranni hopes to avoid the heavy crowds that greeted last year’s carnival at Wharfwall Park in the Whiteroof Ward.

“Last year was the first time we’ve done the carnival since the Last War ended,” said Hanshastra d’Thuranni. “We were pleased at the enthusiastic response from the citizens of Aundair, but a little overwhelmed as well. This year, we know what to expect.”

The new carnival grounds can accommodate more than a thousand fairgoers, d’Thurrani said.

Posters and handbills advertising the carnival have been seen throughout Fairhaven. They promise nightly performances from Myurdan Phoenixfire, master of illusion, a lute-and-flute quartet led by Obranna d’Thurrani, and games of skill and chance.

Handbills also promise “wondrous beasts from across Khorvaire and the deadly jungles of Xen’drik.” Hanshastra d’Thurrani said her House is still negotiating with the crown to permit the importation for display of specific creatures.

“Unfortunately, we’re still working some issues out with the authorities. Carnivalgoers will have to come see for themselves what wonders we’ll display,” she said.

Also uncertain is whether the controversial “seer of the future” Valreyka d’Thurrani will be part of this year’s Carnival. Last year she gave readings to long lines of carnival goers, many of whom found her predictions uncannily accurate. But in the last six months, she’s been deported from both Thrane and Karrnath. In Thrane, her deportation proceedings remain under seal but were handled by inquisitors specializing in heresies against the Silver Flame. Karnnath simply escorted her to the border, with no official reason given.

Hanshastra d’Thurrani refused to discuss Valreyka’s presence or absence at the upcoming fair, saying only that “those seeking to peer into their own futures will not walk away disappointed.”

	

Last Heir Seeks Iron Council Audience
News for Sul, Eyre 8th, 998
By David Noonan




‘Last Heir of the Noldruns’ Seeks Iron Council Audience


KRONA PEAK—Torlan Mroranon announced on Zor that he would forward a Speaker’s Petition to the full Iron Council on behalf of the controversial figure Hrun Noldrun, the self-described “last heir of the Noldruns.”

The council will consider the petition when it reconvenes in two weeks’ time. If approved, then Hrun would be summoned to speak before the Iron Council.

Since Hrun’s arrival in Krona Peak last month, he’s sought official recognition of his clan heritage and settlement of his birthright: the Noldrunhold and the ruined fortress-town of Noldrunethrone.

But the circumstances of his arrival—badly burned, wearing battered armor, and raving about unseen enemies—leave significant doubt over whether he’s truly a member of Clan Noldrun, eradicated by unknown assailants more than four centuries ago.

Facing questions before an ad-hoc collection of clan chiefs last week, Hrun correctly recited several of the Noldrun lineages, but claimed amnesia when asked how he got to Krona Peak and where his wounds came from.

Claimants to the vacant Noldrunhold are not uncommon, with one causing a stir every decade or so. Many were confidence artists seeking rights to the mineral wealth of the Korran’s Maw mines, despite the fact that the mines and Noldrunhold as a whole are infested with dangerous monsters. Others made claims based on novel interpretations of genealogical records—interpretations the Iron Council ultimately rejected.

Some clan chiefs oppose Noldrun claimants on principle, saying that granting them an audience before the Iron Council will only bring more pretenders to Noldrunhold out of the stonework.

But other clans, including the influential Clan Mroranon, support Hrun’s right to address the Iron Council and make a formal claim.

The petition, penned in Torlan Mroranon’s own hand, doesn’t directly state that the Mroranons support Hrun’s claim. It refers to the claim as “worthy of consideration by this august body.”

Council watchers say that the Mroranons may be impressed enough by Hrun’s claims that they’re trying to broker a compromise. Rather than accepting or rejecting Hrun’s claim of Noldrun heritage, the Iron Council could grant provisional acceptance of Hrun’s claim, contingent on him reclaiming Noldrunhold for the dwarves and restarting mining operations at Korran’s Maw.

Such provisional acceptance might mollify those clan chiefs opposed to Noldrun claimants.

“What better way to deal with a fake Noldrun than to simply say: ‘You want Noldrunhold? Then claim it with your axe!’” said clan chief Garrek Soldorak. “If the end result is that we’re feeding a bunch of pretenders to the monsters there, so be it.”


	

Breland Commissions New Warships
News for Sul, Eyre 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Breland Commissions New Warships to Combat Southern Pirates


WROAT—King Boranel announced on Zor that he planned to commission more than a dozen new warships to ply the Thunder Sea on antipiracy patrols.

“Let my voice carry to the south on winds of justice: Any ship flying the bear is under the protection of the great nation of Breland. Crawl back into your holes, villains, or face the wrath of our new warships,” said the crown decree.

Construction of the warships will begin in Sharn within the month. Negotiations described as “routine” are under way with Zilargo to obtain that nation’s expertise in naval architecture.

The ships will likely be christened by autumn, perhaps by Boranel or another member of the royal family.

The announcement of the warship construction set off a flurry of court activity when Admiral Telley ir’Nellish noted that the ships would be named after “Breland’s bravest soldiers from the Last War.” Nobles and retired military officers scrambled to put together petitions touting their valor during the Last War in hopes of having a ship named after them.

An attaché to ir’Nellish said on condition of anonymity that the new warships may wait on the docks for trained crew. The naval officer corps, depleted during the western naval battles near the war’s end, still hasn’t recovered, the attaché said.

“I never thought we’d wind up with more ships than captains,” the attaché said. “But you can build a warship in less than a year, and it takes a lot longer than that to build an officer.”

Drystone Pulls Out of Competition
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Drystone Pulls Out of Korranberg Statuary Competition


KORRANBERG—Declaring that the collapse of its massive clockwork horse was the work of saboteurs, engineers from the Korranberg Library’s Drystone college announced on Wir that they wouldn’t attempt to rebuild the statue.

Before its collapse last Mol night, the metal skeleton of the horse, dubbed “Fleet Providence,” stood nearly 40 feet tall, and the grinding of its gears could be heard across the city.
“If the doyens can’t keep the other colleges from wrecking our work, then there’s no point in rebuilding Fleet Providence,” said Drystone senior researcher Tendro ir’Hushaan. “Although we’re withdrawing, I want my team to take pride in a statue so great that the other colleges knew their only hope was to cheat.”

High councilor Alina Alrene ir’Korran said that so far, Library officials have found no evidence that the collapse had any external cause.

“Drystone’s decision is disappointing, and their forfeit reflects poorly on the whole college, I’m afraid. What happened to the spirit of experimentation?” she asked.

In the end, Drystone’s refusal to rebuild their statue will leave a gaping hole along Warren Street. Each of the other colleges is building a statue to decorate the newly widened road. A jury will select the best statue, which will earn points for the college that built it. The Library’s eight colleges compete fiercely in a number of academic, arcane, and athletic competitions throughout the academic year.

Drystone’s decision to withdraw from the statuary competition means that another college will almost certainly wrest first place in the overall standings from them. Currently the Blackdragon college of Alchemy and the Morridan college of Mathematics are tied behind Drystone, with the Balinor’s Horn college of natural sciences running fourth.

Rampaging Elementals Blamed for Wildfires
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Rampaging Elementals Blamed for Thrane Wildfires


FLAMEKEEP—More than 10,000 acres of the Fields of Arolan continue to burn in central Thrane, the result of devastating wildfires started by marauding fire elementals.

Evacuation preparations are under way in the towns of Athandra and Avaroth, and the village of Tellyn has already been cleared of inhabitants.

The Lord of Castle Morningcrest has refused a Flame decree to abandon his keep, although he’s released all but immediate family members for evacuation.

Settlements near the wildfires are employing both mundane firefighting techniques (such as cutting firebreaks across the fields) and magical responses (such as weather control and various water-based summonings). But because some fire elementals are believed to be amid the flames, the wildfire’s path isn’t predictable.

Thrane authorities and representatives of the Silver Flame promised an investigation into the cause of the blaze as soon as it’s contained. Some fringe sects of the Silver Flame regard fire elementals to be sacred beings that cleanse only the unworthy, a notion that Silver Flame orthodoxy regards as “a miserable, wrongheaded attempt to justify arson.” Rumors among the evacuees routinely place blame among such fringe sects.

	

Low Tides May Reveal Wreckage 
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Low Tides May Reveal Wreckage of Karrn ‘Tribute Fleet’


REKKENMARK—Unusually low tides next month might expose the sunken ships that once carried Khorvaire’s greatest treasures to Karrn the Conqueror, an academy scholar said on Zor.

Jarragan ir’Krannau, a “historical astronomer” affiliated with Rekkenmark Academy’s Karrn Studies program, said the northern shore of Karrnath could briefly experience minus tides of 10 feet to 20 feet. And along the eastern shore of Karrn Bay, known for its tidal surges, the waters might recede even further.

The minus tide might reveal more than a dozen galleys that sunk in a sudden storm in –980 YK. The ships were part of the “Tribute Fleet” that brought gold, jewels and dragonshards from various regional warlords to Karrn the Conqueror, ir’Krannau said.

The minus tide may attract some fortune hunters, ir’Krannau said, but the remote, dangerous terrain near the wreckage site would make a treasure-seeking expedition difficult.

“There’s also no guarantee—someone may have already plundered the ships,” he said. “And the records from the time aren’t clear on whether the fleet was inbound or outbound when it sank.”

Regardless of what’s in the hold, careful study of the tribute fleet represents a treasure-trove of historical lore for scholars, ir’Krannau said. Shipwrecks in northern waters tend to be well-preserved, so scholars will get a glimpse at life aboard Karrn’s navy two millennia ago.

“At the academy, we glory in every detail about Karrn’s land campaigns, but his naval efforts have always been in the background,” he said.

A team of Rekkenmark Academy scholars leaves next week for the Karrn Bay coastline, ir’Krannau said. When the tidal outflow reveals the ships, the scholars will learn as much as they can before the waters reclaim the tribute fleet.



	05/22/2006

	

Repairs Interrupt Lightning Rail
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Repairs Interrupt Starilaskur-Sterngate Lightning Rail

STARILASKUR—House Orien said on Wir that avalanche-clearing operations north of Sterngate would prevent lightning rails from traveling south into Zilargo for at least another week.

Station master Laara d’Orien said that the House had teams of excavators working around the clock to clear rockfalls that buried the lightning rail path at several points in the foothills of the northern Seawall Mountains.

“We expect some rail maintenance delays every spring, but the extent of the avalanches is unprecedented,” she said. “The Starilaskur-Korranberg route is important to us, and we want to restore service as soon as possible.”

The House is compensating ticket holders unable to travel as planned, she said. And House Orien is using the opportunity to unveil a new service: “Splendor Caravans.” The caravans feature comfortable horse-drawn passenger coaches and many of the amenities that lightning rail passengers expect.

“The roads along the Seawall Mountains are in fine shape, and we know that for a lot of our passengers, the journey is as important as the destination. The Splendor Caravans are slower than the lightning rail, true, but they’re a luxurious experience,” d’Orien said.

The Splendor Caravans run between Starilaskur and Sterngate, where lightning rail cars trapped on the far side of the avalanches take passengers to Zolanberg and Korranberg. The journey takes 10 days.

House Orien may eventually add scheduled Spendor Caravans to other routes that don’t currently get lightning rail service, d’Orien said.

The cause of the avalanches is unknown and remains under investigation, d’Orien said.


Fugitives at Large After Prison Break
News for Sul, Dravago 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Dozens of Fugitives at Large After Harrowgard Prison Break

SIGILSTAR—A violent escape attempt from Harrowgard Prison on Zor left 18 guards dead and scores of criminals dead or fleeing into the wilds of southern Thrane.

Thrane army units from nearby Harrowgard Fortress have cordoned off the prison and are investigating the circumstances of the prison break, the first escape since the prison’s construction in the mid 940s.

Cardinal Yannick, expected to visit the site on Zol two days, issued a public prayer that commended the sacrifice of the slain guards and condemned the criminals for their “cowardice in the face of a justly applied sentence.”

“We have no doubt that none can escape the Silver Flame’s ultimate justice, no matter how far they may flee,” she said. “The wise prisoner has an attitude of penance, hoping to have a soul forged anew in flames of silver. But the craven fugitive is a creature of instinct, willing to do evil to satisfy a base urge for freedom.”

Yannick also urged residents of southern Thrane to be vigilant and report any suspicious travelers.

“Let those who would flee proper judgment know that justice is more than a knight’s lance. Justice is also the eyes of the innkeeper, the ears of the woodcutter in the forest, and the stout heart of every Thrane that names a criminal on the run,” she said.

Details on the prison break remain sketchy. Sometime after midnight, a fire broke out along the prison ramparts. A confused battle broke out between rioting prisoners, guards, and possibly mercenaries or bandits attacking the prison from outside its walls. By dawn, one wing of the prison’s main building had collapsed—hours after most prisoners escaped or died in the clashes with guards.

Most of Harrowgard Prison’s inmates were sentenced to long terms during the Last War, often by courts martial for crimes including desertion and gross insubordination. Starting last year, the church of the Silver Flame has taken a more active role in the rehabilitation of prisoners there, offering guidance in religious matters and apprentice-level instruction in several trades.

Brelish Army commanders along Breland’s border with Thrane have stepped up patrols in response to the Harrowgard prison break.

“I figure that if you just broke out of prison, the most natural thing in the world is to try to get across a border,” said Major Ganndo Annatail, “And even a fugitive isn’t going to head into the Mournland—although some of these guys might have been imprisoned so long that they think it’s still Cyre.”

Any fugitives from Harrowgard caught in Breland will be remanded back to Thrane’s custody, Annatail said.


	

Dragonslayer Sniper Claims Sixth Victim
News for Nymm 8th, 998
By David Noonan




'Dragonslayer' Sniper Claims Sixth Victim

SHARN—The mysterious crossbow sniper known to the City Watch as the “Dragonslayer” shot and killed a high-ranking member of House Kundarak on Far night, then posted handbills taunting the inability of the authorities to stop the sniper attacks.

The attack, made at dusk as the victim left a restaurant on Bruneau Street in Korranath, bore the hallmarks of previous attacks: a single magic crossbow bolt shot from a great distance and a corona of fire around the victim that scorches the ground, leaving a black outline around the corpse.

The name of the victim, an elderly male dwarf, was unavailable at press time.

Watch Commander Belew Yorgan expressed confidence that the Dragonslayer would soon be brought to justice, either by the city watch or by House Deneith’s Sentinel Marshals.

“It’s easy to get caught up in the sensational details of these crimes and miss the important point: That this guy is a cold-blooded murderer too cowardly to face his victims,” he said. “We have a number of promising leads, and I think the next handbill you read will be the one announcing his execution date.”

The Dragonslayer has been touting his prowess with handbills and pamphlets that appear after each murder. Last night was no exception; handbills scattered across the Tradefair district criticized House Kundarak lending practices and taunted authorities.

“I am around every corner and atop every roof,” said one handbill acquired by the Sharn Inquisitive. “Neither the jackboot stooges of Sharn’s corpulent councilors nor the brutes-for-coin in the pay of the incestuous dragontainted houses will ever catch me.”

Harrina Thandalask, a sergeant in the watch’s Blackened Book division, said that the handbills are being posted along crowded thoroughfares by someone using an unseen servant spell. Such magic makes it difficult to apprehend whomever’s distributing the handbills, she said.

“People don’t notice the handbills going up right away, and when someone gets curious, the so-called Dragonslayer or a confederate just drops the spell and slips away,” she said.

The Dragonslayer’s victims have been spread across the city. They include:

Ilya d’Cannith, killed Nymm 2 in Ashblack.
Endari d’Tharashk, killed Dravago 20 in the Clifftop district.
Lasca d’Ghallanda, killed Dravago 17 in the North Market district.
Chenni d’Jorasco, killed Dravago 11 in Seventh Tower.
Torlak d’Sivis, killed Dravago 4 in the Callestan district. While the crime scene bore many similarities to subsequent Dragonslayer attacks, no handbills have ever appeared claiming responsibility for the attack.








Rivals Join Forces for Attainder Bill
News for Nymm 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Rivals ir’Tannak and ir’Lann Join Forces for Attainder Bill

WROAT—An unlikely alliance between bitter political foes Kurlo ir’Tannak and Hansa ir’Lann means that the Silver Lake Attainder Decree is likely to pass Parliament by month’s end.

“Never let it be said that the Tannak family will put personality before what’s good for Breland,” ir’Tannak said. “The merits of this decree are beyond question, and I’ll be proud to cast my vote for it.

“Let the past stay where it is,” said ir’Lann in a rare speech before Parliament. “Bury the past with all the honor that you bury the bravest soldier, but then march onward and carry the day for Breland.”

While their speeches on Wir sounded common themes, the pair have oratorical styles as opposite as their previous positions. Kurlo ir’Tannak’s speech alternated between fiery rhetoric against “enemies of Breland, foreign and domestic” and folksy appeals for support from his “lords and brothers.” Hansa ir’Lann’s quavering voice could barely be heard in the upper galleries—a reason why most of his legislative work is done behind the scenes.

If ir’Tannak and ir’Lann both vote in favor of the attainder decree, it will mark the first time they’ve ever cast their votes together, excepting strictly ceremonial decrees. As recently as last year, ir’Tannak accused ir’Lann of treason and ir’Lann called ir’Tannak “an unrepentant drunkard” in the wake of the controversial High Seas Accords.

Their rivalry predates their postwar service in Parliament. It’s widely believed that ir’Tannak and ir’Lann engaged in fisticuffs in the middle of the Battle of Red Creek in 979, when both were colonels under legendary General Bollandar, separately sent to seize a key bridge. Records of the incident remain sealed, and given the folkloric quality of the tale, its veracity remains unknown.

If passed by Parliament and signed by King Boranel, the attainder decree would mandate the forfeiture of property belonging to 14 family estates along the southern shore of Silver Lake. Those families, citing Thrane advances along the northern front, refused to send manor guards to break a Droaamite siege of Six Kings in 988.

Ownership of the estates would pass to the crown.


Key Advisor to Crown Retires
News for Nymm 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Key Advisor to Crown Retires

WROAT—Count Narvian ir’Turlendess, a trusted advisor to King Boranel on diplomatic and military matters, has retired to his family estate in southern Breland, the court announced on Zul.

Narvian was among the Breland court’s strongest inclusionist voices, arguing that even Breland’s enemies should be signatories to the Treaty of Thronehold and various side agreements.

Inclusionists often quote his “Marra Won’t Come Home” speech before the Breland Parliament in 995. Throughout the speech, ir’Turlendess spoke movingly of his daughter Marra, captured and executed by Sora Kell forces in 987. But despite his loss, ir’Turlendess said, Droaam should be included in Thronehold negotiations. Barring negotiations with other nations, “no matter how repulsive,” would be counterproductive and won’t bring his daughter back. Though his arguments failed to persuade the crown, ir’Turlendess remained an influential figure at court throughout the Thronehold negotiations.

“Narvian’s voice was always clear and wise, and his eyes were always focused on what was best for Breland,” said King Boranel in a crown decree that accompanied the announcement. “It is with great sadness that I watch him depart Wroat, and I’ll miss his honest, well-reasoned advice.”

Narvian ir’Turlendess learned statecraft as a regional representative to the Ministry of the Exchequer in 960, charged with advocating for southwest Breland’s landowners on taxation issues. In 971 he received his first major appointment within the ministry and spent most of the 980s as the crown’s chief advisor on military funding issues. His role expanded to include diplomatic responsibilities near the Last War’s end; he was Breland’s representative to the Thronehold working group tasked with gradually drawing down the armies of the signatory nations.

Since the end of the Last War, ir’Turlendess acted as an unofficial ambassador to parts of Khorvaire that the Treaty of Thronehold didn’t grant nation-state status to, such as Droaam and the Cyran refugees.

The crown is widely expected to confer a significant honorary title upon Narvian ir’Turlendess during its month-end proclamation.



Last Starwind Sailor Dies at 184
News for Nymm 8th, 998
By David Noonan




Last Starwind Sailor Dies at 184

STORMHOME—Corvin d’Lyrandar, the last surviving member of the famed Starwind airship voyage, died on Zor surrounded by family at his residence in Stormhome. He was 184.

One of the fourteen crew members that returned with the battered airship in 814 YK, d’Lyrandar later served his house throughout the Last War, eventually captaining the Countess Karlia, an elemental galleon that plied the Bitter Sea. He retired from the seas when the Last War ended, family members said.

But his fame was set when the badly listing Starwind reappeared over the skies of Sharn in 841. The Starwind was believed lost at sea after a hurricane struck the western coast of Khorvaire in 839.

But Captain Tessian d’Lyrandar told a wondrous tale of his airship being sucked into a vortex leading to strange lands beyond Eberron. Fictionalized versions of Tessian’s logbook started turning up shortly after the Starwind’s return, becoming something of a literary genre unto themselves in the mid-850s.

The actual logbooks remain under lock and key with House Lyrandar, but public statements from Tessian indicate that the Starwind visited multiple lands of “surpassing strangeness” and also visited each of Eberron’s known continents, if only briefly.

Captain Tessian d’Lyrandar died in battle with pirates in 880. His will included extensive provisions for splitting the “recovered booty of the Starwind voyage.” Responding to hundreds of inquiries from treasure-seekers, House Lyrandar elders said that the Starwind’s hold was empty when it returned. Furthermore, the airship’s logs gave no indication of a discovered treasure.

Asked about Tessian’s will last year, Corvin d’Lyrandar dismissed it as “Just a joke. There’s no ‘treasure of Starwind,’ that’s for sure. We saw a lot of strange things, but nothing that would make us rich. In any case, the House would get the treasure, not us.”

With no direct descendants, Corvin d’Lyrandar’s estate will be auctioned within the House next month.



War Widow Land Grant Lottery Set
News for Lharvion 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




"War Widow" Land Grant Lottery Set for 28th of Barrakas

FAIRHAVEN—Queen Aurala has set a date for the long-anticipated land-grant lottery: the 28th of Barrakas.

A court decree on Far set a date and drawing procedure for the lottery, set to take place at noon in Fairhold’s Vermillion Pavilion. But the decree noted that some eligibility requirements for specific land parcels are still under review, leaving unclear who’ll be able to place lots for some of the more sought-after properties.

Although it’s widely referred to as the “war widow” lottery, only some parcels are designated specifically for widows of soldiers who fell in Aundair’s service during the Last War. Preliminary drafts of the lottery parcel list have shown a wide array of eligibility requirements. Many parcels will be given to those with relatives lost in the Last War, while others are set aside for Aundair’s veterans. Most of the prime parcels have additional requirements of noble title, sometimes of specific families living nearby.

While the crown decree takes pains to point out the Queen’s generosity in giving away large tracts of land, the land-grant lottery is expected to fill Aundair’s coffers in the long-term. Many of the parcels in the lottery are crumbling, vacant castles with significant upkeep costs and no arable land nearby. Once removed from the crown’s rolls, the land parcels become taxable property once again. Thus the crown is both spared upkeep and may garner revenue from the land-grant lottery.

The land-grant lottery was originally scheduled for last month, but has been twice delayed as Aundairian courts adjudicated claims from distant relatives and other parties seeking to keep specific parcels out of the lottery. In many cases, ownership of a parcel fell to the crown when its owner died in the war and no inheritor was available. But once a parcel appears on the list for the lottery, “second cousins, secret wives, and every con artist in Aundair have come out of the woodwork” to make an ownership claim, said one magistrate speaking on condition of anonymity.


Midnight Battery Was Politically Motivated
News for Lharvion 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Council Aspirant Says Midnight Battery Was ‘No Doubt’ Politically Motivated

SHARN—Gandrall Nurri, campaigning to replace Thurik Davandi as the Upper Menthis represenative on the Sharn Council, said on Sar that there was “no doubt” that his severe beating in front of an upscale Menthis restaurant last week was politically.

“Sharn politics is what it is, and I’ve been around long enough to not be surprised that my political enemies would resort to thuggery,” he said from the balcony of his Platinate home. “But I also know that you only use violence when you’re losing the battle of ideas. And that’s what I’m waging: a campaign of ideas.”

Nurri hopes to be named councilor for Upper Menthis on the 9th of Rhaan, and he’s been speaking publicly in the district nearly every day for the last month. Crowd reaction to his “Clean Up Sharn” platform has been mixed.

Three dark-garbed assailants attacked Nurri last Zor as he was departing Galdin’s Garden, a popular restaurant in the Seventh Tower district of Upper Menthis. Nurri was thrown from a nearby bridge, but managed to cling to a buttress until passersby rescued him. Nurri’s attackers are still at large.

Davandi denied any connection with the attack on Nurri.

“Ultimately, it’s for Upper Menthis to decide whether I’m an effective voice for their interests,” he said. “I think if you look at what we’ve done lately—new bridges in Den’iyas, stronger City Watch patrols in Platinate and Seventh Tower, and steady funding for Morgrave University—I think it’s clear that Upper Menthis is in good hands.”





Thrane Promises Return of Minnarek Friezes
News for Lharvion 22nd, 998
By David Noonan




Thrane Promises Return of Minnarek Friezes

SHARN—The Minnarek Friezes, taken by Thrane soldiers during the Last War, will be returned to Breland by year’s end, said Anador ir’Laisha, speaking on behalf of the Keeper of the Flame.

The twelve friezes, which depict in bas-relief torch-bearing men on horseback, are considered some of the best examples of pre-Galifaran sculpture. Nearly 2,000 years old, they were originally created by the blind sculptor Minnarek as a tribute to Karrn the Conquerer and decorated a shrine in Hatheril that commemorated Karrn’s victory in the Battle of Brey.

In 959, Thrane soldiers removed the friezes from the Hatheril shrine because their subject matter included torch flames. The friezes were taken to Flamekeep, where they remained on display until the signing of the Treaty of Thronehold two years ago.

“All of Thrane hopes that the restoration of these friezes can mark a new stage in our relations with Breland,” ir’Laisha said. “Now that the war is over, a lot of these artistic treasures, swept up in the winds of war, can be returned to their rightful owners.”

Thrane is eager to establish a commission with artists and historians from all of the Thronehold signatories to establish procedures for the return of national treasures, she said.

“We’ve made our views on artistic heritage well known, and now that Khorvaire is at peace, we’ll push more strongly for all nations to return objects of artistic and cultural relevance. Karrnath’s continued custody of the Gorith Handmaiden Tryptych, for example, continues to sadden the hearts of art lovers everywhere,” she said.









